4904 | risky (adjective): involving risk or danger | loc: ризикований
  EN TS: Those chairs look a bit risky.
  ua TS: Ці стільці мають трохи ризикований вигляд.
  EN FS: Those tables look a bit risky.
  ua FS: Ці столи мають трохи ризикований вигляд.
  EN TP: a risky stack of chairs
  ua TP: ризикована гора стільців
  EN FP: a risky bet on horses
  ua FP: ризикована ставка на коней
4905 | span (verb): to cover or extend over an area | loc: перетинати
  EN TS: The bridge spans the canyon.
  ua TS: Міст перетинає каньйон.
  EN FS: The bridge spans the street.
  ua FS: Міст перетинає вулицю.
  EN TP: arches spanning a canyon
  ua TP: арки, що перетинають каньйон
  EN FP: a short attention span
  ua FP: коротка тривалість уваги
4906 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: намет
  EN TS: The tent is the only survivor.
  ua TS: Намет — єдиний, хто вижив.
  EN FS: The arch is the only survivor.
  ua FS: Арка — єдина, хто вижила.
  EN TP: a white party tent
  ua TP: білий святковий намет
  EN FP: a tent in the woods
  ua FP: намет у лісі
4907 | speaker (noun): a device that converts signals into sounds | loc: динамік
  EN TS: Big speaker, dancing water.
  ua TS: Великий динамік, вода танцює.
  EN FS: Big speaker, dancing milk.
  ua FS: Великий динамік, молоко танцює.
  EN TP: a big club speaker
  ua TP: великий клубний динамік
  EN FP: a speaker at a conference
  ua FP: спікер на конференції
4908 | branch (noun): a stem growing out from a plant's main stem | loc: гілка | translator note: FP: bank branch is "відділення" in Ukrainian, used "metro line" (гілка метро) to keep the word
  EN TS: Someone is bending a branch.
  ua TS: Хтось згинає гілку.
  EN FS: Someone is cutting a branch.
  ua FS: Хтось зрізає гілку.
  EN TP: bending an apple branch
  ua TP: згинати гілку яблуні
  EN FP: a branch of a bank
  ua FP: гілка метро
4909 | famous (adjective): widely known and admired by people | loc: відомий
  EN TS: People are filming her like she is famous.
  ua TS: Її знімають, ніби вона відома.
  EN FS: People are painting her like she is famous.
  ua FS: Її малюють, ніби вона відома.
  EN TP: famous for a minute
  ua TP: відома на хвилинку
  EN FP: famous for her songs
  ua FP: відома своїми піснями
4910 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: шарф
  EN TS: He is screaming in his team scarf!
  ua TS: Він кричить у шарфі своєї команди!
  EN FS: He is sleeping in his team scarf!
  ua FS: Він спить у шарфі своєї команди!
  EN TP: a striped team scarf
  ua TP: смугастий шарф команди
  EN FP: a warm winter scarf
  ua FP: теплий зимовий шарф
4911 | owner (noun): someone who owns a business | loc: власник
  EN TS: She is the new owner!
  ua TS: Вона тут новий власник!
  EN FS: He is the new owner!
  ua FS: Він тут новий власник!
  EN TP: the new cafe owner
  ua TP: новий власник кав'ярні
  EN FP: the new cafe cook
  ua FP: новий кухар кав'ярні
4912 | instructor (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: інструктор
  EN TS: The instructor is kicking.
  ua TS: Інструктор б'є ногою.
  EN FS: The instructor is dancing.
  ua FS: Інструктор танцює.
  EN TP: a karate instructor
  ua TP: інструктор з карате
  EN FP: a driving instructor
  ua FP: інструктор з водіння
4913 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: браслет
  EN TS: She is fastening a bracelet.
  ua TS: Вона застібає браслет.
  EN FS: She is fastening a necklace.
  ua FS: Вона застібає намисто.
  EN TP: a woven beaded bracelet
  ua TP: плетений браслет з бісеру
  EN FP: buying a gold bracelet
  ua FP: купівля золотого браслета
4914 | guitar (noun): a stringed instrument with six strings | loc: гітара
  EN TS: Everyone loves the guitar guy.
  ua TS: Усі люблять хлопця з гітарою.
  EN FS: Everyone loves the drum guy.
  ua FS: Усі люблять хлопця з барабанами.
  EN TP: playing an acoustic guitar
  ua TP: грати на акустичній гітарі
  EN FP: fixing an acoustic guitar
  ua FP: лагодити акустичну гітару
4915 | shoulder (noun): the body part between the neck and the arm | loc: плече
  EN TS: They are walking shoulder to shoulder.
  ua TS: Вони йдуть плече до плеча.
  EN FS: They are sitting shoulder to shoulder.
  ua FS: Вони сидять плече до плеча.
  EN TP: arms over shoulders
  ua TP: руки на плечах
  EN FP: a bag on the shoulder
  ua FP: сумка на плечі
4916 | bicycle (noun): a vehicle with two wheels moved by pedals | loc: велосипед
  EN TS: We made it! Two bicycles, one sunset.
  ua TS: Ми зробили це! Два велосипеди, один захід сонця.
  EN FS: We made it! Two scooters, one sunset.
  ua FS: Ми зробили це! Два самокати, один захід сонця.
  EN TP: bicycles on a pier
  ua TP: велосипеди на пірсі
  EN FP: bicycles on a train
  ua FP: велосипеди в потязі
4917 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: стріляти
  EN TS: Red shot blue. Gotcha!
  ua TS: Червоний вистрілив у синього. Попався!
  EN FS: Blue shot red. Gotcha!
  ua FS: Синій вистрілив у червоного. Попався!
  EN TP: shooting paint at a player
  ua TP: стріляти фарбою в гравця
  EN FP: shooting a basketball
  ua FP: кидок м'яча в кошик
4918 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: сходи
  EN TS: He is climbing the stairs.
  ua TS: Він підіймається сходами.
  EN FS: He is sliding down the stairs.
  ua FS: Він з'їжджає сходами.
  EN TP: up the stairs with bags
  ua TP: нагору сходами з сумками
  EN FP: down the stairs alone
  ua FP: сам униз сходами
4919 | membership (noun): being a member of a group | loc: членство
  EN TS: She signed up for membership.
  ua TS: Вона оформила членство.
  EN FS: She signed up for yoga.
  ua FS: Вона оформила абонемент на йогу.
  EN TP: a photo club membership
  ua TP: членство у фотоклубі
  EN FP: a gym membership card
  ua FP: картка членства в спортзалі
4920 | community (noun): people from one area who do things together | loc: громада
  EN TS: The community is cheering!
  ua TS: Громада вболіває!
  EN FS: The community is crying!
  ua FS: Громада плаче!
  EN TP: a community garden sign
  ua TP: табличка саду громади
  EN FP: an online community
  ua FP: онлайн-громада
4921 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: стежка
  EN TS: The trail is full of roots.
  ua TS: Стежка вся в корінні.
  EN FS: The trail is full of snow.
  ua FS: Стежка вся в снігу.
  EN TP: a rough forest trail
  ua TP: нерівна лісова стежка
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  ua FP: стежка зі слідів
4922 | host (noun): the person who invites guests and cares for them | loc: господар
  EN TS: The host welcomes his guests.
  ua TS: Господар вітає своїх гостей.
  EN FS: The host ignores his guests.
  ua FS: Господар ігнорує своїх гостей.
  EN TP: a host raising his glass
  ua TP: господар піднімає келих
  EN FP: a talk show host
  ua FP: ведучий ток-шоу
4923 | seat (verb): to show someone to a seat | loc: посадити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is seating two guests.
  ua TS: Вона садить двох гостей за стіл.
  EN FS: She is seating four guests.
  ua FS: Вона садить чотирьох гостей за стіл.
  EN TP: seating a young couple
  ua TP: посадити молоду пару
  EN FP: seating herself at the bar
  ua FP: сідати за барну стійку
4924 | familiar (adjective): easily recognized because you know it well | loc: знайомий
  EN TS: She sees a familiar face.
  ua TS: Вона бачить знайоме обличчя.
  EN FS: She sees a familiar dog.
  ua FS: Вона бачить знайомого пса.
  EN TP: a familiar face
  ua TP: знайоме обличчя
  EN FP: a familiar song
  ua FP: знайома пісня
4925 | care (verb): to look after someone who needs care | loc: доглядати
  EN TS: She is caring for a patient.
  ua TS: Вона доглядає пацієнта.
  EN FS: She is caring for a baby.
  ua FS: Вона доглядає немовля.
  EN TP: caring for a hospital patient
  ua TP: доглядати пацієнта в лікарні
  EN FP: caring for a garden
  ua FP: доглядати сад
4926 | dentist (noun): a person whose job is to fix and clean teeth | loc: стоматолог
  EN TS: The dentist has a mirror.
  ua TS: У стоматолога дзеркальце.
  EN FS: The dentist has a phone.
  ua FS: У стоматолога телефон.
  EN TP: a dentist with a mirror
  ua TP: стоматолог із дзеркальцем
  EN FP: a dentist pulling a tooth
  ua FP: стоматолог рве зуб
4927 | lawyer (noun): a person whose job is to practice law | loc: юрист
  EN TS: The lawyer is shaking hands.
  ua TS: Юрист тисне руку.
  EN FS: The lawyer is holding hands.
  ua FS: Юрист тримається за руки.
  EN TP: a lawyer with a briefcase
  ua TP: юрист із портфелем
  EN FP: a lawyer with a laptop
  ua FP: юрист із ноутбуком
4928 | to fix (verb): to put something broken back together | loc: лагодити
  EN TS: He fixed the leak himself!
  ua TS: Він сам полагодив протікання!
  EN FS: He fixed the car himself!
  ua FS: Він сам полагодив машину!
  EN TP: fixing a leaking sink
  ua TP: лагодити раковину, що тече
  EN FP: fixing a broken car
  ua FP: лагодити зламану машину
4929 | grade (noun): the value your school work is given | loc: оцінка
  EN TS: Guess who got a top grade!
  ua TS: Вгадай, хто отримав найвищу оцінку!
  EN FS: Guess who got a bad grade!
  ua FS: Вгадай, хто отримав погану оцінку!
  EN TP: a top grade
  ua TP: найвища оцінка
  EN FP: a bad grade
  ua FP: погана оцінка
4930 | reward (noun): something you get for doing worthy acts | loc: нагорода
  EN TS: Her reward is a gold star!
  ua TS: Її нагорода — золота зірочка!
  EN FS: Her reward is a silver star!
  ua FS: Її нагорода — срібна зірочка!
  EN TP: a gold star reward
  ua TP: нагорода — золота зірочка
  EN FP: a reward for lost keys
  ua FP: нагорода за загублені ключі
4931 | diagram (noun): a drawing that explains how something works | loc: схема
  EN TS: She is explaining a diagram.
  ua TS: Вона пояснює схему.
  EN FS: She is explaining a poem.
  ua FS: Вона пояснює вірш.
  EN TP: a chalk diagram
  ua TP: схема крейдою
  EN FP: a textbook diagram
  ua FP: схема з підручника
4932 | to steer (verb): to turn a wheel to control where a boat goes | loc: керувати кермом | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Cool cap! She is steering a taxi.
  ua TS: Класна кепка! Вона керує таксі.
  EN FS: Cool cap! She is steering a boat.
  ua FS: Класна кепка! Вона керує човном.
  EN TP: steering a yellow taxi
  ua TP: керувати жовтим таксі
  EN FP: steering a yellow boat
  ua FP: керувати жовтим човном
4933 | wheel (noun): a round frame that turns on an axle | loc: колесо | checker: word_missing? | translator note: steering wheel = кермо; колесо is wrong for this sense
  EN TS: One hand stays on the wheel.
  ua TS: Одна рука завжди лишається на кермі.
  EN FS: One hand stays on the phone.
  ua FS: Одна рука завжди лишається на телефоні.
  EN TP: a bus steering wheel
  ua TP: кермо автобуса
  EN FP: a bus spare wheel
  ua FP: запасне колесо автобуса
4934 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: гарнітура
  EN TS: She is putting on a headset.
  ua TS: Вона вдягає гарнітуру.
  EN FS: She is putting on a helmet.
  ua FS: Вона вдягає шолом.
  EN TP: a green pilot headset
  ua TP: зелена гарнітура пілота
  EN FP: a VR headset for games
  ua FP: VR-гарнітура для ігор
4935 | compass (noun): an instrument whose needle shows you north | loc: компас
  EN TS: She is touching the compass.
  ua TS: Вона торкається компаса.
  EN FS: She is touching the radio.
  ua FS: Вона торкається радіо.
  EN TP: a brass ship's compass
  ua TP: латунний корабельний компас
  EN FP: a compass for drawing circles
  ua FP: циркуль для креслення
4936 | kitchen (noun): a room equipped for preparing meals | loc: кухня
  EN TS: She is cooking in a kitchen.
  ua TS: Вона готує на кухні.
  EN FS: She is cooking in a garden.
  ua FS: Вона готує в саду.
  EN TP: a professional kitchen
  ua TP: професійна кухня
  EN FP: a home kitchen
  ua FP: домашня кухня
4937 | ring (verb): to sound loudly, like a bell | loc: дзвонити
  EN TS: He is ringing the bell.
  ua TS: Він дзвонить у дзвоник.
  EN FS: He is ringing the doorbell.
  ua FS: Він дзвонить у дверний дзвінок.
  EN TP: ringing the service bell
  ua TP: дзвонити в дзвоник на рецепції
  EN FP: ringing a friend
  ua FP: дзвонити другові
4938 | waitress (noun): a woman who serves food to guests in a restaurant | loc: офіціантка
  EN TS: She's a busy waitress.
  ua TS: Вона — заклопотана офіціантка.
  EN FS: She's a busy nurse.
  ua FS: Вона — заклопотана медсестра.
  EN TP: a waitress on a terrace
  ua TP: офіціантка на терасі
  EN FP: a waitress in a kitchen
  ua FP: офіціантка на кухні
4939 | golden (adjective): shining with the bright yellow colour of gold | loc: золотий
  EN TS: Golden crust. Nice work, baker.
  ua TS: Золота скоринка. Гарна робота, пекарю.
  EN FS: Burnt crust. Great work, baker.
  ua FS: Підгоріла скоринка. Чудова робота, пекарю.
  EN TP: golden brown croissants
  ua TP: золотисто-рум'яні круасани
  EN FP: a golden wedding ring
  ua FP: золота обручка
4940 | butcher (noun): a person who cuts and sells meat | loc: м'ясник
  EN TS: The butcher is wrapping meat.
  ua TS: М'ясник загортає м'ясо.
  EN FS: The butcher is wrapping gifts.
  ua FS: М'ясник загортає подарунки.
  EN TP: a butcher wrapping steak
  ua TP: м'ясник загортає стейк
  EN FP: a butcher cutting chicken
  ua FP: м'ясник рубає курку
4941 | firefighter (noun): a person whose job is putting out fires | loc: пожежник
  EN TS: The firefighter saved a cat!
  ua TS: Пожежник врятував кота!
  EN FS: The firefighter saved a dog!
  ua FS: Пожежник врятував пса!
  EN TP: a firefighter saving a cat
  ua TP: пожежник рятує кота
  EN FP: a firefighter fighting a fire
  ua FP: пожежник гасить пожежу
4942 | luggage (noun): bags you carry your things in when traveling | loc: багаж
  EN TS: One bag of luggage? Legend!
  ua TS: Одна сумка багажу? Легенда!
  EN FS: Five bags of luggage? Legend!
  ua FS: П'ять сумок багажу? Легенда!
  EN TP: luggage over his shoulder
  ua TP: багаж на плечі
  EN FP: luggage on a trolley
  ua FP: багаж на візку
4943 | praise (noun): words or clapping that show approval | loc: похвала
  EN TS: He loves all this praise.
  ua TS: Він обожнює всю цю похвалу.
  EN FS: He hates all this praise.
  ua FS: Він ненавидить всю цю похвалу.
  EN TP: praise from the film crew
  ua TP: похвала від знімальної групи
  EN FP: praise from his teacher
  ua FP: похвала від учителя
4944 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: бальна сукня
  EN TS: Spotlight, roses and a gold gown!
  ua TS: Прожектор, троянди й золота бальна сукня!
  EN FS: Spotlight, roses and a red gown!
  ua FS: Прожектор, троянди й червона бальна сукня!
  EN TP: a long pale-gold gown
  ua TP: довга світло-золота бальна сукня
  EN FP: trying on a wedding gown
  ua FP: приміряти весільну сукню
4945 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: співати
  EN TS: She is singing into the mic.
  ua TS: Вона співає в мікрофон.
  EN FS: She is singing into a phone.
  ua FS: Вона співає в телефон.
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  ua TP: співати в мікрофон
  EN FP: singing in a choir
  ua FP: співати в хорі
4946 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: хвіст
  EN TS: Her ponytail is dancing too.
  ua TS: Її хвіст теж танцює.
  EN FS: Her scarf is dancing too.
  ua FS: Її шарф теж танцює.
  EN TP: a swinging ponytail
  ua TP: хвіст, що розгойдується
  EN FP: a ponytail under a cap
  ua FP: хвіст під кепкою
4947 | portrait (noun): a picture that shows a person's face | loc: портрет
  EN TS: Portrait done. Arms up!
  ua TS: Портрет готовий. Руки вгору!
  EN FS: Landscape done. Arms up!
  ua FS: Пейзаж готовий. Руки вгору!
  EN TP: a finished portrait
  ua TP: готовий портрет
  EN FP: a portrait of a cat
  ua FP: портрет кота
4948 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: міський обрій
  EN TS: Make-up with a skyline view. Fancy.
  ua TS: Макіяж із видом на міський обрій. Шик.
  EN FS: Make-up with a beach view. Fancy.
  ua FS: Макіяж із видом на пляж. Шик.
  EN TP: a city skyline behind her
  ua TP: міський обрій за нею
  EN FP: a skyline at sunset
  ua FP: обрій на заході сонця
4949 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: краєвид
  EN TS: Snowy peaks: amazing scenery.
  ua TS: Засніжені вершини: неймовірний краєвид.
  EN FS: Sandy dunes: amazing scenery.
  ua FS: Піщані дюни: неймовірний краєвид.
  EN TP: mountain scenery from the top
  ua TP: гірський краєвид з вершини
  EN FP: scenery from a train window
  ua FP: краєвид з вікна потяга
4950 | hip (noun): the part where the leg joins the waist | loc: стегно
  EN TS: Hands on hips. Very serious.
  ua TS: Руки на стегнах. Дуже серйозно.
  EN FS: Hands on heads. Very serious.
  ua FS: Руки на головах. Дуже серйозно.
  EN TP: hands on the hips
  ua TP: руки на стегнах
  EN FP: swinging the hips
  ua FP: хитати стегнами
4951 | home (adverb): to the place where your home is | loc: додому
  EN TS: He is home, and the dog is happy!
  ua TS: Він повернувся додому, і пес щасливий!
  EN FS: He is home, and the cat is happy!
  ua FS: Він повернувся додому, і кіт щасливий!
  EN TP: coming home to the dog
  ua TP: прийти додому до пса
  EN FP: leaving home for work
  ua FP: піти з дому на роботу
4952 | bed (noun): the piece of furniture you sleep on | loc: ліжко
  EN TS: He missed his bed so much.
  ua TS: Він так скучив за своїм ліжком.
  EN FS: He missed his car so much.
  ua FS: Він так скучив за своєю машиною.
  EN TP: dropping onto the bed
  ua TP: падати на ліжко
  EN FP: making the bed
  ua FP: застеляти ліжко
4953 | hope (verb): to wish for something and expect it to happen | loc: сподіватися
  EN TS: She is hoping for photosynthesis.
  ua TS: Вона сподівається на фотосинтез.
  EN FS: She is hoping for a thunderstorm.
  ua FS: Вона сподівається на грозу.
  EN TP: hoping for a sprout
  ua TP: сподіватися на паросток
  EN FP: hoping for a rainbow
  ua FP: сподіватися на веселку
4954 | visit (noun): going to see someone for a short time | loc: візит
  EN TS: The visit makes her so happy!
  ua TS: Цей візит робить її такою щасливою!
  EN FS: The visit makes her so sad!
  ua FS: Цей візит робить її такою сумною!
  EN TP: a hospital visit
  ua TP: візит у лікарню
  EN FP: a visit to the zoo
  ua FP: візит до зоопарку
4955 | locker (noun): a storage box for your clothes and valuables | loc: шафка
  EN TS: Only the lockers look tidy here.
  ua TS: Тут охайні лише шафки.
  EN FS: Only the bunk beds look tidy here.
  ua FS: Тут охайні лише двоярусні ліжка.
  EN TP: a row of grey lockers
  ua TP: ряд сірих шафок
  EN FP: a locker at a pool
  ua FP: шафка в басейні
4956 | reception (noun): the front desk where guests check in | loc: рецепція
  EN TS: She is walking to reception.
  ua TS: Вона йде до рецепції.
  EN FS: She is walking to the kitchen.
  ua FS: Вона йде на кухню.
  EN TP: the hostel reception desk
  ua TP: стійка рецепції хостелу
  EN FP: a wedding reception
  ua FP: весільний банкет
4957 | hotel (noun): a building where travelers pay to stay | loc: готель
  EN TS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 2,000 EUR.
  ua TS: Ціни в готелях — від дешевих до 2 000 євро.
  EN FS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 20 EUR.
  ua FS: Ціни в готелях — від дешевих до 20 євро.
  EN TP: three kinds of hotel
  ua TP: три види готелів
  EN FP: a hotel by the sea
  ua FP: готель біля моря
4958 | villa (noun): a large, expensive house with a garden | loc: вілла
  EN TS: From a hut to a glass villa!
  ua TS: З хатинки — у скляну віллу!
  EN FS: From a hut to a wooden villa!
  ua FS: З хатинки — у дерев'яну віллу!
  EN TP: a huge glass villa
  ua TP: величезна скляна вілла
  EN FP: a holiday villa for rent
  ua FP: вілла в оренду на відпустку
4959 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: хатина
  EN TS: A cottage with a sunflower.
  ua TS: Хатина із соняшником.
  EN FS: A cottage with an apple tree.
  ua FS: Хатина з яблунею.
  EN TP: a small wooden cottage
  ua TP: маленька дерев'яна хатина
  EN FP: a cottage by a lake
  ua FP: хатина біля озера
4960 | cuddle (verb): to hold someone close in a soft, loving way | loc: пригортати
  EN TS: They are cuddling at arrivals!
  ua TS: Вони пригортаються в залі прильоту!
  EN FS: They are fighting at arrivals!
  ua FS: Вони б'ються в залі прильоту!
  EN TP: a group cuddle at arrivals
  ua TP: пригортатися всією компанією в аеропорту
  EN FP: cuddling a teddy bear
  ua FP: пригортати плюшевого ведмедика
4961 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: домашній улюбленець
  EN TS: The pet is hunting a toy.
  ua TS: Домашній улюбленець полює на іграшку.
  EN FS: The pet is hunting a ball.
  ua FS: Домашній улюбленець полює на м'ячик.
  EN TP: a pet cat hunting
  ua TP: кіт-улюбленець на полюванні
  EN FP: a pet cat sleeping
  ua FP: кіт-улюбленець спить
4962 | binoculars (noun): double lenses for seeing far-away things | loc: бінокль
  EN TS: He is using binoculars. Deer alert!
  ua TS: Він дивиться в бінокль. Увага, олень!
  EN FS: He is using a telescope. Deer alert!
  ua FS: Він дивиться в телескоп. Увага, олень!
  EN TP: looking through binoculars
  ua TP: дивитися в бінокль
  EN FP: binoculars at the opera
  ua FP: бінокль в опері
4963 | finger (noun): any of the long parts on your hand, not the thumb | loc: палець
  EN TS: She hurt her finger, then her toe!
  ua TS: Вона поранила палець, а потім ще й на нозі!
  EN FS: She hurt her finger, then her ear!
  ua FS: Вона поранила палець, а потім ще й вухо!
  EN TP: a hurt finger
  ua TP: поранений палець
  EN FP: pointing a finger at him
  ua FP: показувати на нього пальцем
4964 | to taste (verb): to taste a little of something | loc: куштувати
  EN TS: Soup to taste, then flowers. Smooth.
  ua TS: Спершу дати скуштувати суп, потім квіти. Спритно.
  EN FS: Soup to taste, then chocolate. Smooth.
  ua FS: Спершу дати скуштувати суп, потім шоколад. Спритно.
  EN TP: tasting soup from a spoon
  ua TP: куштувати суп з ложки
  EN FP: tasting wine at a party
  ua FP: куштувати вино на вечірці
4965 | bathroom (noun): a room with a bath or shower and a washbasin | loc: ванна кімната
  EN TS: The bathroom routine is done.
  ua TS: Ранкова рутина у ванній кімнаті завершена.
  EN FS: The kitchen routine is done.
  ua FS: Ранкова рутина на кухні завершена.
  EN TP: brushing teeth in the bathroom
  ua TP: чистити зуби у ванній кімнаті
  EN FP: singing in the bathroom
  ua FP: співати у ванній кімнаті
4966 | split (verb): to separate something into parts | loc: розколоти
  EN TS: The ice split in two.
  ua TS: Лід розколовся навпіл.
  EN FS: The ice split in three.
  ua FS: Лід розколовся на три частини.
  EN TP: splitting a slab of ice
  ua TP: розколоти брилу льоду
  EN FP: splitting a log of wood
  ua FP: розколоти колоду дров
4967 | identity (noun): the characteristics by which a person is known | loc: ідентичність | checker: word_missing? | translator note: identity check = особа; ідентичність is the psychological sense
  EN TS: A scan checks her identity.
  ua TS: Сканер перевіряє її особу.
  EN FS: A scan checks her luggage.
  ua FS: Сканер перевіряє її багаж.
  EN TP: checking her identity
  ua TP: перевірка її особи
  EN FP: hiding her identity
  ua FP: приховувати свою особу
4968 | card (noun): a card that shows your identity | loc: картка
  EN TS: She got her new ID card!
  ua TS: Вона отримала нову ID-картку!
  EN FS: She got her new phone!
  ua FS: Вона отримала новий телефон!
  EN TP: a new identity card
  ua TP: нова ID-картка
  EN FP: a new birthday card
  ua FP: нова вітальна картка
4969 | cafe (noun): a small restaurant selling drinks and snacks | loc: кав'ярня
  EN TS: At the cafe, her book wins.
  ua TS: У кав'ярні її книжка перемагає.
  EN FS: At the cafe, his phone wins.
  ua FS: У кав'ярні його телефон перемагає.
  EN TP: reading at a cafe table
  ua TP: читати за столиком у кав'ярні
  EN FP: working in a cafe kitchen
  ua FP: працювати на кухні кав'ярні
4970 | independence (noun): freedom from the control of others | loc: незалежність
  EN TS: Fireworks for independence!
  ua TS: Феєрверки на честь незалежності!
  EN FS: Candles for independence!
  ua FS: Свічки на честь незалежності!
  EN TP: celebrating independence
  ua TP: святкувати незалежність
  EN FP: fighting for independence
  ua FP: боротися за незалежність
4971 | fireworks (noun): things that explode in the sky with colour | loc: феєрверк
  EN TS: Fireworks light up the dome.
  ua TS: Феєрверк освітлює купол.
  EN FS: Fireworks light up the bridge.
  ua FS: Феєрверк освітлює міст.
  EN TP: fireworks over a dome
  ua TP: феєрверк над куполом
  EN FP: fireworks over a lake
  ua FP: феєрверк над озером
4972 | patriotic (adjective): inspired by love for your country | loc: патріотичний
  EN TS: What a patriotic night!
  ua TS: Яка патріотична ніч!
  EN FS: What a patriotic morning!
  ua FS: Який патріотичний ранок!
  EN TP: a patriotic crowd
  ua TP: патріотичний натовп
  EN FP: a patriotic army parade
  ua FP: патріотичний військовий парад
4973 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: пам'ятник
  EN TS: He is posing at a monument.
  ua TS: Він позує біля пам'ятника.
  EN FS: He is posing at a waterfall.
  ua FS: Він позує біля водоспаду.
  EN TP: posing at a white monument
  ua TP: позувати біля білого пам'ятника
  EN FP: a monument on a mountain
  ua FP: пам'ятник на горі
4974 | seller (noun): someone who exchanges goods for money | loc: продавець
  EN TS: The seller is pouring like a pro.
  ua TS: Продавець наливає як профі.
  EN FS: The seller is juggling like a pro.
  ua FS: Продавець жонглює як профі.
  EN TP: a tea seller pouring
  ua TP: продавець чаю наливає
  EN FP: a seller of flowers
  ua FP: продавець квітів
4975 | different (adjective): unlike something else in nature or quality | loc: інший
  EN TS: Her style is so different!
  ua TS: Її стиль зовсім інший!
  EN FS: His style is so different!
  ua FS: Його стиль зовсім інший!
  EN TP: different from the crowd
  ua TP: не така, як усі інші
  EN FP: different from her sister
  ua FP: не така, як її сестра
4976 | wade (verb): to walk through shallow water | loc: брести | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is wading through water.
  ua TS: Він бреде по воді.
  EN FS: He is wading through snow.
  ua FS: Він бреде по снігу.
  EN TP: wading in rice fields
  ua TP: брести рисовими полями
  EN FP: wading in deep snow
  ua FP: брести глибоким снігом
4977 | hand (noun): the end of the limb you grab things with | loc: рука
  EN TS: A hand is leading the way.
  ua TS: Рука показує дорогу.
  EN FS: A dog is leading the way.
  ua FS: Пес показує дорогу.
  EN TP: an outstretched open hand
  ua TP: простягнута відкрита рука
  EN FP: a hand full of rice
  ua FP: рука, повна рису
4978 | cook (noun): someone who cooks food | loc: кухар
  EN TS: The cook is playing with fire!
  ua TS: Кухар грається з вогнем!
  EN FS: The cook is playing with ice!
  ua FS: Кухар грається з льодом!
  EN TP: a cook at a wok
  ua TP: кухар біля вока
  EN FP: a cook at a grill
  ua FP: кухар біля гриля
4979 | office (noun): a place of business where people do office work | loc: офіс
  EN TS: The whole office is sick!
  ua TS: Увесь офіс захворів!
  EN FS: The whole office is asleep!
  ua FS: Увесь офіс заснув!
  EN TP: coughing in the office
  ua TP: кашляти в офісі
  EN FP: singing in the office
  ua FP: співати в офісі
4980 | to breathe (verb): to draw air into your lungs and let it out | loc: дихати
  EN TS: They are breathing in deeply.
  ua TS: Вони глибоко дихають.
  EN FS: They are shouting out loudly.
  ua FS: Вони голосно кричать.
  EN TP: to breathe in fresh air
  ua TP: дихати свіжим повітрям
  EN FP: to breathe under water
  ua FP: дихати під водою
4981 | vaccine (noun): an injection that protects you from a disease | loc: вакцина
  EN TS: Everyone got the vaccine. Yay!
  ua TS: Усі отримали вакцину. Ура!
  EN FS: Nobody got the vaccine. Yay!
  ua FS: Ніхто не отримав вакцину. Ура!
  EN TP: vaccines in upper arms
  ua TP: вакцини у плече
  EN FP: a vaccine in the leg
  ua FP: вакцина в ногу
4982 | ankle (noun): the joint between your leg and your foot | loc: щиколотка
  EN TS: He is holding his ankle.
  ua TS: Він тримається за щиколотку.
  EN FS: He is holding his head.
  ua FS: Він тримається за голову.
  EN TP: a hurt ankle
  ua TP: травмована щиколотка
  EN FP: a bracelet on the ankle
  ua FP: браслет на щиколотці
4983 | officer (noun): a person who holds a position of authority | loc: офіцер
  EN TS: The officer is checking everything, even under the van.
  ua TS: Офіцер перевіряє все, навіть під фургоном.
  EN FS: The officer is checking everything, even under the bus.
  ua FS: Офіцер перевіряє все, навіть під автобусом.
  EN TP: an officer checking a van
  ua TP: офіцер перевіряє фургон
  EN FP: an officer on a ship
  ua FP: офіцер на кораблі
4984 | briefcase (noun): a stiff flat case for carrying papers | loc: портфель
  EN TS: Briefcase in hand, he's skating!
  ua TS: Портфель у руці — і він на скейті!
  EN FS: Coffee cup in hand, he's skating!
  ua FS: Стаканчик кави в руці — і він на скейті!
  EN TP: skating with a briefcase
  ua TP: кататися на скейті з портфелем
  EN FP: a briefcase full of papers
  ua FP: портфель, повний паперів
4985 | fix (verb): to attach something firmly in place | loc: закріпити
  EN TS: The screens are fixed in place.
  ua TS: Екрани закріплені на місці.
  EN FS: The mirrors are fixed in place.
  ua FS: Дзеркала закріплені на місці.
  EN TP: fixing screens to the wall
  ua TP: закріпити екрани на стіні
  EN FP: fixing a meeting date
  ua FP: закріпити дату зустрічі
4986 | bright (adjective): giving off a lot of light | loc: яскравий
  EN TS: The wall is a bit bright.
  ua TS: Стіна трішки яскрава.
  EN FS: The wall is a bit dark.
  ua FS: Стіна трішки темна.
  EN TP: bright blue screens
  ua TP: яскраві сині екрани
  EN FP: a bright sunny day
  ua FP: яскравий сонячний день
4987 | present (verb): to give an exhibition of work to an audience | loc: презентувати
  EN TS: She presented. Coffee won.
  ua TS: Вона презентувала. Перемогла кава.
  EN FS: She presented. Pizza won.
  ua FS: Вона презентувала. Перемогла піца.
  EN TP: presenting her work
  ua TP: презентувати свою роботу
  EN FP: presenting a TV show
  ua FP: вести телешоу
4988 | attack (noun): a military move against an enemy with weapons | loc: атака
  EN TS: The attack is starting!
  ua TS: Атака починається!
  EN FS: The picnic is starting!
  ua FS: Пікнік починається!
  EN TP: a medieval attack
  ua TP: середньовічна атака
  EN FP: a heart attack
  ua FP: серцевий напад
4989 | hill (noun): a raised piece of land, smaller than a mountain | loc: пагорб
  EN TS: They are storming down the hill!
  ua TS: Вони мчать униз з пагорба!
  EN FS: They are storming down the road!
  ua FS: Вони мчать униз дорогою!
  EN TP: charging down a hill
  ua TP: атака вниз з пагорба
  EN FP: rolling down a hill
  ua FP: котитися з пагорба
4990 | iron (noun): the hot tool for pressing clothes smooth | loc: праска
  EN TS: He is using a heavy iron.
  ua TS: Він користується важкою праскою.
  EN FS: He is using a heavy hammer.
  ua FS: Він користується важким молотком.
  EN TP: a heavy steam iron
  ua TP: важка парова праска
  EN FP: an iron pan
  ua FP: чавунна сковорідка
4991 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: розкуйовджений | checker: word_missing? | translator note: розкуйовджений = dishevelled (hair), wrong for a pile; used безладний
  EN TS: What a messy pile of clothes!
  ua TS: Яка безладна купа одягу!
  EN FS: What a messy pile of books!
  ua FS: Яка безладна купа книжок!
  EN TP: a messy pile of clothes
  ua TP: безладна купа одягу
  EN FP: a messy kitchen table
  ua FP: захаращений кухонний стіл
4992 | busy (adjective): fully occupied with what you are doing | loc: зайнятий
  EN TS: So much ironing! She is busy.
  ua TS: Стільки прасування! Вона зайнята.
  EN FS: So much cooking! She is busy.
  ua FS: Стільки готування! Вона зайнята.
  EN TP: busy with the ironing
  ua TP: зайнята прасуванням
  EN FP: busy with the dishes
  ua FP: зайнята посудом
4993 | alone (adjective): kept apart from others, on your own | loc: сам
  EN TS: She is all alone on the lake.
  ua TS: Вона зовсім сама на озері.
  EN FS: She is all alone on the beach.
  ua FS: Вона зовсім сама на пляжі.
  EN TP: alone on a tiny island
  ua TP: сама на крихітному острові
  EN FP: alone in a big city
  ua FP: сама у великому місті
4994 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: дерев'яний
  EN TS: She is using a wooden spoon.
  ua TS: Вона користується дерев'яною ложкою.
  EN FS: She is using a metal spoon.
  ua FS: Вона користується металевою ложкою.
  EN TP: a long wooden spoon
  ua TP: довга дерев'яна ложка
  EN FP: a wooden chopping board
  ua FP: дерев'яна обробна дошка
4995 | sculpture (noun): a three-dimensional work of art | loc: скульптура
  EN TS: A fountain with a sculpture.
  ua TS: Фонтан зі скульптурою.
  EN FS: A fountain with a clock.
  ua FS: Фонтан з годинником.
  EN TP: a stone fountain sculpture
  ua TP: кам'яна скульптура фонтану
  EN FP: a wedding ice sculpture
  ua FP: весільна крижана скульптура
4996 | cone (noun): any cone-shaped object you can hold | loc: ріжок
  EN TS: Pigeons love her ice cream cone.
  ua TS: Голуби обожнюють її ріжок з морозивом.
  EN FS: Seagulls love her ice cream cone.
  ua FS: Чайки обожнюють її ріжок з морозивом.
  EN TP: an ice cream cone
  ua TP: ріжок морозива
  EN FP: an orange traffic cone
  ua FP: помаранчевий дорожній конус
4997 | laugh (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: сміх
  EN TS: He has a loud laugh.
  ua TS: У нього гучний сміх.
  EN FS: He has a quiet laugh.
  ua FS: У нього тихий сміх.
  EN TP: a laugh at the Colosseum
  ua TP: сміх біля Колізею
  EN FP: a laugh in Paris
  ua FP: сміх у Парижі
4998 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: тунель
  EN TS: The tunnel is made of gates.
  ua TS: Тунель складається з воріт.
  EN FS: The tunnel is made of trees.
  ua FS: Тунель складається з дерев.
  EN TP: a tunnel of shrine gates
  ua TP: тунель із воріт святилища
  EN FP: a tunnel under the sea
  ua FP: тунель під морем
4999 | combat (verb): to battle against someone in a fight | loc: битися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He's combating a swordsman.
  ua TS: Він б'ється з мечником.
  EN FS: He's combating an archer.
  ua FS: Він б'ється з лучником.
  EN TP: combating a swordsman
  ua TP: битися з мечником
  EN FP: combating a bad cold
  ua FP: боротися із застудою
5000 | thin (adjective): not thick from one surface to the other | loc: тонкий
  EN TS: His thin slices look perfect.
  ua TS: Його тонкі скибочки — просто ідеал.
  EN FS: His thick slices look perfect.
  ua FS: Його товсті скибочки — просто ідеал.
  EN TP: thin slices of fish
  ua TP: тонкі скибочки риби
  EN FP: thin slices of bread
  ua FP: тонкі скибочки хліба
5001 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: краєвид
  EN TS: Worth it for this landscape.
  ua TS: Заради такого краєвиду варто було.
  EN FS: Worth it for this beach.
  ua FS: Заради такого пляжу варто було.
  EN TP: a mountain landscape
  ua TP: гірський краєвид
  EN FP: a landscape painting
  ua FP: краєвид на картині
5002 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: сутінки
  EN TS: They are jumping in at dusk.
  ua TS: Вони стрибають у воду в сутінках.
  EN FS: They are jumping in at noon.
  ua FS: Вони стрибають у воду опівдні.
  EN TP: a forest lake at dusk
  ua TP: лісове озеро в сутінках
  EN FP: dusk in a big city
  ua FP: сутінки у великому місті
5003 | explorer (noun): someone who travels into little known places | loc: дослідник
  EN TS: An explorer is cutting a path.
  ua TS: Дослідник прорубує стежку.
  EN FS: An explorer is cutting a tree.
  ua FS: Дослідник зрубує дерево.
  EN TP: an explorer with a machete
  ua TP: дослідник з мачете
  EN FP: an explorer with a map
  ua FP: дослідник з мапою
5004 | spring (verb): to move forward in big leaps | loc: стрибати
  EN TS: The kangaroo is springing forward.
  ua TS: Кенгуру стрибає вперед.
  EN FS: The kangaroo is springing backward.
  ua FS: Кенгуру стрибає назад.
  EN TP: to spring across the sand
  ua TP: стрибати по піску
  EN FP: to spring out of bed
  ua FP: вистрибнути з ліжка
5005 | bay (noun): a part of the sea curving into the land | loc: затока
  EN TS: She sees everything in this bay.
  ua TS: Вона бачить усе в цій затоці.
  EN FS: She sees everything in this park.
  ua FS: Вона бачить усе в цьому парку.
  EN TP: boats in a quiet bay
  ua TP: човни в тихій затоці
  EN FP: a bay full of ice
  ua FP: затока, повна льоду
5006 | kettle (noun): the pot you boil water in for tea or coffee | loc: чайник
  EN TS: Her kettle is working hard.
  ua TS: Її чайник працює на повну.
  EN FS: Her toaster is working hard.
  ua FS: Її тостер працює на повну.
  EN TP: boiling water in a kettle
  ua TP: кип'ятити воду в чайнику
  EN FP: a kettle on a fire
  ua FP: чайник на вогнищі
5007 | lock (noun): a fastener on a door that keeps it closed | loc: замок
  EN TS: Yes! Her key is in the lock!
  ua TS: Так! Її ключ у замку!
  EN FS: Yes! Her key is in the car!
  ua FS: Так! Її ключ у машині!
  EN TP: a key in the lock
  ua TP: ключ у замку
  EN FP: a lock on a bike
  ua FP: замок на велосипеді
5008 | unlock (verb): to open the lock of something with a key | loc: відмикати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She unlocked the wooden door.
  ua TS: Вона відімкнула дерев'яні двері.
  EN FS: She unlocked the garage door.
  ua FS: Вона відімкнула двері гаража.
  EN TP: to unlock the wooden door
  ua TP: відмикати дерев'яні двері
  EN FP: to unlock a phone
  ua FP: розблокувати телефон
5009 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: дитина
  EN TS: The child is sliding down.
  ua TS: Дитина з'їжджає вниз.
  EN FS: The child is climbing up.
  ua FS: Дитина лізе вгору.
  EN TP: a child on a slide
  ua TP: дитина на гірці
  EN FP: a child on a swing
  ua FP: дитина на гойдалці
5010 | king (noun): a man who rules a kingdom | loc: король
  EN TS: Long live the king!
  ua TS: Хай живе король!
  EN FS: Long live the queen!
  ua FS: Хай живе королева!
  EN TP: a king on a balcony
  ua TP: король на балконі
  EN FP: a king on a horse
  ua FP: король на коні
5011 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: старий
  EN TS: The old couple is kissing, how cute!
  ua TS: Стара пара цілується, як мило!
  EN FS: The old couple is dancing, how cute!
  ua FS: Стара пара танцює, як мило!
  EN TP: an old couple kissing
  ua TP: стара пара цілується
  EN FP: an old couple dancing
  ua FP: стара пара танцює
5012 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: романтичні стосунки | translator note: романтичні стосунки does not fit "full of romance"; used романтика
  EN TS: Paris is full of romance!
  ua TS: Париж сповнений романтики!
  EN FS: Paris is full of snow!
  ua FS: Париж сповнений снігу!
  EN TP: romance in Paris
  ua TP: романтика в Парижі
  EN FP: a romance novel
  ua FP: любовний роман
5013 | cheap (adjective): low in price, not costing much | loc: дешевий
  EN TS: The cheap kitchen is old.
  ua TS: Дешева кухня стара.
  EN FS: The cheap kitchen is huge.
  ua FS: Дешева кухня величезна.
  EN TP: a cheap old kitchen
  ua TP: дешева стара кухня
  EN FP: a cheap fast car
  ua FP: дешева швидка машина
5014 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: багатий
  EN TS: The rich cook has the best view.
  ua TS: У багатого кухаря найкращий краєвид.
  EN FS: The rich cook has the best dog.
  ua FS: У багатого кухаря найкращий пес.
  EN TP: a rich man's kitchen
  ua TP: кухня багатого чоловіка
  EN FP: a rich man's car
  ua FP: машина багатого чоловіка
5015 | homemade (adjective): made at home by yourself, not bought | loc: домашній
  EN TS: Homemade bread, made by hand.
  ua TS: Домашній хліб, зроблений вручну.
  EN FS: Homemade pasta, made by hand.
  ua FS: Домашня паста, зроблена вручну.
  EN TP: a homemade loaf of bread
  ua TP: буханка домашнього хліба
  EN FP: homemade jam in jars
  ua FP: домашнє варення в банках
5016 | knee (noun): the joint in the middle of your leg | loc: коліно
  EN TS: He is bending his knees.
  ua TS: Він згинає коліна.
  EN FS: He is bending his arms.
  ua FS: Він згинає руки.
  EN TP: bare knees in a squat
  ua TP: голі коліна в присіданні
  EN FP: down on one knee
  ua FP: на одному коліні
5017 | cut (adjective): separated into pieces with a sharp knife | loc: нарізаний
  EN TS: A rainbow of cut vegetables!
  ua TS: Веселка з нарізаних овочів!
  EN FS: A rainbow of cut fruit!
  ua FS: Веселка з нарізаних фруктів!
  EN TP: cut vegetables in rows
  ua TP: нарізані овочі рядами
  EN FP: cut flowers in a vase
  ua FP: зрізані квіти у вазі
5018 | tasty (adjective): pleasing to the sense of taste | loc: смачний
  EN TS: That meal looks so tasty!
  ua TS: Яка смачна на вигляд страва!
  EN FS: That soup looks so tasty!
  ua FS: Який смачний на вигляд суп!
  EN TP: a tasty bowl of rice
  ua TP: смачна миска рису
  EN FP: a tasty slice of cake
  ua FP: смачний шматок торта
5019 | beef (noun): meat from an adult cow | loc: яловичина
  EN TS: She is grilling beef.
  ua TS: Вона смажить яловичину на грилі.
  EN FS: She is grilling fish.
  ua FS: Вона смажить рибу на грилі.
  EN TP: slices of grilled beef
  ua TP: скибочки яловичини з гриля
  EN FP: a beef burger with fries
  ua FP: бургер з яловичиною і картоплею фрі
5020 | replace (verb): to put a new thing in place of a broken one | loc: замінити
  EN TS: Two people to replace one bulb!
  ua TS: Двоє людей, щоб замінити одну лампочку!
  EN FS: Five people to replace one bulb!
  ua FS: П'ятеро людей, щоб замінити одну лампочку!
  EN TP: replacing a dead bulb
  ua TP: замінити перегорілу лампочку
  EN FP: replacing a flat tyre
  ua FP: замінити пробите колесо
5021 | lady (noun): a polite name for any woman | loc: пані
  EN TS: Such an elegant lady pouring tea.
  ua TS: Така елегантна пані наливає чай.
  EN FS: Such an elegant lady pouring wine.
  ua FS: Така елегантна пані наливає вино.
  EN TP: a lady in a bonnet
  ua TP: пані в капелюшку
  EN FP: a lady on a horse
  ua FP: пані на коні
5022 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: сяяти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The chandelier is shining!
  ua TS: Люстра сяє!
  EN FS: The mirror is shining!
  ua FS: Дзеркало сяє!
  EN TP: a shining chandelier
  ua TP: сяюча люстра
  EN FP: shining shoes
  ua FP: сяючі черевики
5023 | airplane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings, powered by jets | loc: літак
  EN TS: He is cheering at an airplane!
  ua TS: Він радіє літаку!
  EN FS: He is cheering at a train!
  ua FS: Він радіє потягу!
  EN TP: an airplane landing low
  ua TP: літак низько заходить на посадку
  EN FP: an airplane taking off
  ua FP: літак злітає
5024 | dictionary (noun): a book that lists words and what they mean | loc: словник
  EN TS: She has all the dictionaries!
  ua TS: У неї всі словники!
  EN FS: She has all the cookbooks!
  ua FS: У неї всі кулінарні книги!
  EN TP: a stack of dictionaries
  ua TP: стос словників
  EN FP: a dictionary app
  ua FP: застосунок-словник
5025 | joke (noun): a funny remark that causes laughter | loc: жарт
  EN TS: OMG, this joke is too funny!
  ua TS: Боже, цей жарт надто смішний!
  EN FS: OMG, this lesson is too funny!
  ua FS: Боже, цей урок надто смішний!
  EN TP: a joke on a phone
  ua TP: жарт у телефоні
  EN FP: a joke from the teacher
  ua FP: жарт від учителя
5026 | hilarious (adjective): very funny, causing wild laughter | loc: надзвичайно смішний
  EN TS: His phone is hilarious today.
  ua TS: Його телефон сьогодні надзвичайно смішний.
  EN FS: His book is hilarious today.
  ua FS: Його книжка сьогодні надзвичайно смішна.
  EN TP: hilarious in a lecture
  ua TP: надзвичайно смішний на лекції
  EN FP: hilarious at a wedding
  ua FP: надзвичайно смішний на весіллі
5027 | judge (noun): an official who settles questions in court | loc: суддя
  EN TS: The judge is using her gavel.
  ua TS: Суддя користується своїм молотком.
  EN FS: The judge is using her phone.
  ua FS: Суддя користується своїм телефоном.
  EN TP: a judge with a gavel
  ua TP: суддя з молотком
  EN FP: a judge in a wig
  ua FP: суддя в перуці
5028 | difficult (adjective): not easy, needing a lot of effort to do | loc: складний
  EN TS: Difficult case? Just a few books.
  ua TS: Складна справа? Лише кілька книжок.
  EN FS: Difficult case? Just a few pens.
  ua FS: Складна справа? Лише кілька ручок.
  EN TP: a difficult court case
  ua TP: складна судова справа
  EN FP: a difficult exam
  ua FP: складний іспит
5029 | gesture (noun): a motion of the hands or body to show a feeling | loc: жест
  EN TS: His gesture says: I won!
  ua TS: Його жест каже: я переміг!
  EN FS: Her gesture says: I won!
  ua FS: Її жест каже: я перемогла!
  EN TP: a winning fist gesture
  ua TP: переможний жест кулаком
  EN FP: a rude hand gesture
  ua FP: грубий жест рукою
5030 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: костюм
  EN TS: Her costume has every colour!
  ua TS: У її костюмі є всі кольори!
  EN FS: Her hat has every colour!
  ua FS: У її капелюсі є всі кольори!
  EN TP: a rainbow feather costume
  ua TP: райдужний костюм з пір'ям
  EN FP: a costume for Halloween
  ua FP: костюм на Гелловін
5031 | leader (noun): a person who guides others | loc: лідер
  EN TS: The leader is pointing ahead.
  ua TS: Лідер показує вперед.
  EN FS: The leader is sitting down.
  ua FS: Лідер сідає.
  EN TP: a leader on a mountain
  ua TP: лідер на горі
  EN FP: a leader on a beach
  ua FP: лідер на пляжі
5032 | ahead (adverb): in front of the others | loc: попереду
  EN TS: She is leading the team ahead.
  ua TS: Вона йде попереду й веде команду.
  EN FS: She is leading the team back.
  ua FS: Вона йде позаду й веде команду.
  EN TP: walking ahead of the group
  ua TP: іти попереду групи
  EN FP: planning ahead for the trip
  ua FP: планувати поїздку наперед
5033 | drum (noun): a musical instrument you hit to make a beat | loc: барабан
  EN TS: The neighbours can hear these drums.
  ua TS: Сусіди чують ці барабани.
  EN FS: The neighbours can hear these horns.
  ua FS: Сусіди чують ці труби.
  EN TP: beating the drums
  ua TP: бити в барабани
  EN FP: a drum solo
  ua FP: соло на барабанах
5034 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: розлити
  EN TS: Everything spills in her home!
  ua TS: У неї вдома все розливається!
  EN FS: Everything burns in her home!
  ua FS: У неї вдома все горить!
  EN TP: milk spilling on the table
  ua TP: розлите на столі молоко
  EN FP: spilling coffee on a laptop
  ua FP: розлити каву на ноутбук
5035 | talent (noun): natural abilities or qualities you have | loc: талант
  EN TS: That juggler has talent!
  ua TS: У цього жонглера талант!
  EN FS: That singer has talent!
  ua FS: У цього співака талант!
  EN TP: a talent for juggling
  ua TP: талант до жонглювання
  EN FP: a talent show
  ua FP: шоу талантів
5036 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: вчитися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She teaches, he learns. Slowly.
  ua TS: Вона вчить, він вчиться. Повільно.
  EN FS: He teaches, she learns. Slowly.
  ua FS: Він вчить, вона вчиться. Повільно.
  EN TP: learning to juggle
  ua TP: вчитися жонглювати
  EN FP: learning to dance
  ua FP: вчитися танцювати
5037 | sidewalk (noun): the paved path beside a road where people walk | loc: тротуар
  EN TS: She is on a Paris sidewalk.
  ua TS: Вона на паризькому тротуарі.
  EN FS: She is on a Paris bridge.
  ua FS: Вона на паризькому мосту.
  EN TP: a wide paved sidewalk
  ua TP: широкий брукований тротуар
  EN FP: a sidewalk cafe table
  ua FP: столик кав'ярні на тротуарі
5038 | pace (noun): how fast you are walking or running | loc: темп
  EN TS: A steady pace up the Great Wall.
  ua TS: Рівний темп угору Великою китайською стіною.
  EN FS: A steady pace down the Great Wall.
  ua FS: Рівний темп униз Великою китайською стіною.
  EN TP: a steady running pace
  ua TP: рівний темп бігу
  EN FP: a slow walking pace
  ua FP: повільний темп ходьби
5039 | cage (noun): a box of metal bars that shuts an animal in | loc: клітка
  EN TS: He is opening the cages.
  ua TS: Він відчиняє клітки.
  EN FS: He is closing the cages.
  ua FS: Він зачиняє клітки.
  EN TP: opening the bird cages
  ua TP: відчиняти пташині клітки
  EN FP: cleaning the bird cages
  ua FP: чистити пташині клітки
5040 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: крісло
  EN TS: An armchair? On a bike? Sure.
  ua TS: Крісло? На велосипеді? Ну звісно.
  EN FS: A sofa? On a bike? Sure.
  ua FS: Диван? На велосипеді? Ну звісно.
  EN TP: a yellow velvet armchair
  ua TP: жовте оксамитове крісло
  EN FP: an armchair in a car
  ua FP: крісло в машині
5041 | flash (noun): a sudden burst of bright light | loc: спалах
  EN TS: A white flash lights the roof.
  ua TS: Білий спалах освітлює дах.
  EN FS: A green flash lights the roof.
  ua FS: Зелений спалах освітлює дах.
  EN TP: a blinding white flash
  ua TP: сліпучий білий спалах
  EN FP: a camera flash indoors
  ua FP: спалах камери в приміщенні
5042 | painful (adjective): causing pain in your body or mind | loc: болісний
  EN TS: Leg day was painful!
  ua TS: День ніг був болісним!
  EN FS: Arm day was painful!
  ua FS: День рук був болісним!
  EN TP: painful stiff legs
  ua TP: болісні закляклі ноги
  EN FP: a painful sunburn
  ua FP: болісний сонячний опік
5043 | silent (adjective): with no sound at all | loc: тихий
  EN TS: The lion is not silent.
  ua TS: Лев зовсім не тихий.
  EN FS: The lion is not alone.
  ua FS: Лев зовсім не сам.
  EN TP: not a silent lion
  ua TP: не тихий лев
  EN FP: a silent lion
  ua FP: тихий лев
5044 | hear (verb): to notice a sound with your ears | loc: чути | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He can hear through the door.
  ua TS: Він чує крізь двері.
  EN FS: He can hear through the wall.
  ua FS: Він чує крізь стіну.
  EN TP: hearing through a door
  ua TP: чути крізь двері
  EN FP: hearing a doorbell ring
  ua FP: чути дзвінок у двері
5045 | sound (noun): the effect you hear from something | loc: звук
  EN TS: The speakers make a big sound!
  ua TS: Колонки дають гучний звук!
  EN FS: The drums make a big sound!
  ua FS: Барабани дають гучний звук!
  EN TP: sound from a boombox
  ua TP: звук з бумбоксу
  EN FP: sound from a car radio
  ua FP: звук з автомагнітоли
5046 | television (noun): broadcasting moving pictures to a screen | loc: телебачення
  EN TS: The television made him jump!
  ua TS: Через телебачення він аж підскочив!
  EN FS: The television made him cry!
  ua FS: Через телебачення він аж розплакався!
  EN TP: watching television
  ua TP: дивитися телебачення
  EN FP: fixing the television
  ua FP: лагодити телевізор
5047 | living room (noun): the room in a home where people sit and relax | loc: вітальня
  EN TS: Nobody is leaving the living room tonight.
  ua TS: Сьогодні з вітальні ніхто не йде.
  EN FS: Nobody is leaving the kitchen tonight.
  ua FS: Сьогодні з кухні ніхто не йде.
  EN TP: a cosy living room
  ua TP: затишна вітальня
  EN FP: cleaning the living room
  ua FP: прибирати вітальню
5048 | shut (adjective): closed, not open | loc: зачинений
  EN TS: Big padlock, doors still shut.
  ua TS: Великий замок, а двері досі зачинені.
  EN FS: Big padlock, doors wide open.
  ua FS: Великий замок, а двері навстіж.
  EN TP: doors firmly shut
  ua TP: міцно зачинені двері
  EN FP: eyes shut tight
  ua FP: міцно заплющені очі
5049 | close (verb): to move something so an opening is blocked | loc: зачиняти
  EN TS: He is closing the front door.
  ua TS: Він зачиняє вхідні двері.
  EN FS: He is closing the garage door.
  ua FS: Він зачиняє двері гаража.
  EN TP: closing a front door
  ua TP: зачиняти вхідні двері
  EN FP: closing a shop
  ua FP: зачиняти магазин
5050 | lose (verb): to fail to win | loc: програти
  EN TS: He lost, and the guests left.
  ua TS: Він програв, і гості пішли.
  EN FS: He won, and the guests left.
  ua FS: Він виграв, і гості пішли.
  EN TP: losing an election
  ua TP: програти вибори
  EN FP: losing his car keys
  ua FP: загубити ключі від машини
5051 | lose (verb): to put something where you cannot find it | loc: загубити
  EN TS: She lost it. Passport, maybe?
  ua TS: Вона щось загубила. Паспорт, може?
  EN FS: She found it. Passport, maybe?
  ua FS: Вона щось знайшла. Паспорт, може?
  EN TP: losing something important
  ua TP: загубити щось важливе
  EN FP: losing a football match
  ua FP: програти футбольний матч
5052 | light (adjective): having little physical weight, not heavy | loc: легкий
  EN TS: The bags are not light.
  ua TS: Сумки зовсім не легкі.
  EN FS: The chairs are not light.
  ua FS: Стільці зовсім не легкі.
  EN TP: suitcases that are not light
  ua TP: зовсім не легкі валізи
  EN FP: light hand luggage
  ua FP: легкий ручний багаж
5053 | label (noun): a short description that identifies something | loc: етикетка
  EN TS: The label displays her photo.
  ua TS: На етикетці її фото.
  EN FS: The label displays her dog.
  ua FS: На етикетці її пес.
  EN TP: a label with her photo
  ua TP: етикетка з її фото
  EN FP: a label on a jar
  ua FP: етикетка на банці
5054 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: піднімати
  EN TS: Bro is lifting half the house.
  ua TS: Бро піднімає пів хати.
  EN FS: Bro is lifting half the tent.
  ua FS: Бро піднімає пів намету.
  EN TP: lifting cases into a van
  ua TP: піднімати валізи у фургон
  EN FP: lifting weights in a gym
  ua FP: піднімати штангу в залі
5055 | organ (noun): a body part in an animal with its own function | loc: орган
  EN TS: Two pink organs: the lungs.
  ua TS: Два рожеві органи: легені.
  EN FS: Two pink organs: the kidneys.
  ua FS: Два рожеві органи: нирки.
  EN TP: a pair of breathing organs
  ua TP: пара органів дихання
  EN FP: a church organ playing
  ua FP: церковний орган грає
5056 | maid (noun): a woman whose job is cleaning hotel rooms | loc: покоївка
  EN TS: The maid made a towel swan.
  ua TS: Покоївка зробила лебедя з рушника.
  EN FS: The maid made a towel dog.
  ua FS: Покоївка зробила песика з рушника.
  EN TP: a maid folding towels
  ua TP: покоївка складає рушники
  EN FP: a maid in a castle
  ua FP: покоївка в замку
5057 | mail (noun): letters and packages sent by post | loc: пошта
  EN TS: Her mail is flying everywhere!
  ua TS: Її пошта розлітається навсібіч!
  EN FS: Her cash is flying everywhere!
  ua FS: Її готівка розлітається навсібіч!
  EN TP: mail from the mailbox
  ua TP: пошта з поштової скриньки
  EN FP: mail on a computer
  ua FP: електронна пошта на комп'ютері
5058 | postman (noun): a person whose job is to bring letters to houses | loc: листоноша
  EN TS: The boy loves the postman now.
  ua TS: Тепер хлопчик обожнює листоношу.
  EN FS: The boy loves the teacher now.
  ua FS: Тепер хлопчик обожнює вчителя.
  EN TP: a postman with letters
  ua TP: листоноша з листами
  EN FP: a postman with a dog
  ua FP: листоноша із собакою
5059 | letter (noun): a written message you send to a person | loc: лист
  EN TS: He got a lot of letters!
  ua TS: Він отримав купу листів!
  EN FS: He got a lot of flowers!
  ua FS: Він отримав купу квітів!
  EN TP: a stack of letters
  ua TP: стос листів
  EN FP: a letter from school
  ua FP: лист зі школи
5060 | male (noun): a person of the sex that cannot have babies | loc: чоловік
  EN TS: Only males are in this video.
  ua TS: У цьому відео лише чоловіки.
  EN FS: Only girls are in this video.
  ua FS: У цьому відео лише дівчата.
  EN TP: males of every age
  ua TP: чоловіки різного віку
  EN FP: males in a football team
  ua FP: чоловіки футбольної команди
5061 | aquarium (noun): a glass tank of water where fish are kept | loc: акваріум
  EN TS: Oh wow, what an aquarium!
  ua TS: Ого, оце акваріум!
  EN FS: Oh wow, what a volcano!
  ua FS: Ого, оце вулкан!
  EN TP: a huge aquarium
  ua TP: величезний акваріум
  EN FP: a huge swimming pool
  ua FP: величезний басейн
5062 | boss (noun): a person who is in control of workers | loc: бос
  EN TS: The boss is drawing a graph.
  ua TS: Бос малює графік.
  EN FS: The boss is drawing a cat.
  ua FS: Бос малює кота.
  EN TP: a boss giving instructions
  ua TP: бос дає вказівки
  EN FP: a boss taking a break
  ua FP: бос бере перерву
5063 | column (noun): a line of people following one after another | loc: колона
  EN TS: The column is moving in order.
  ua TS: Колона рухається злагоджено.
  EN FS: The crowd is moving in order.
  ua FS: Натовп рухається злагоджено.
  EN TP: a column of marching ranks
  ua TP: колона марширує шеренгами
  EN FP: a column in a newspaper
  ua FP: колонка в газеті
5064 | trumpet (noun): a brass instrument you blow into | loc: труба
  EN TS: A hundred trumpets. My poor ears!
  ua TS: Сотня труб. Мої бідні вуха!
  EN FS: A hundred violins. My poor ears!
  ua FS: Сотня скрипок. Мої бідні вуха!
  EN TP: marching with trumpets
  ua TP: марширувати з трубами
  EN FP: a jazz club trumpet
  ua FP: труба в джаз-клубі
5065 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: прохід
  EN TS: A long aisle of spices.
  ua TS: Довгий прохід зі спеціями.
  EN FS: A long aisle of shoes.
  ua FS: Довгий прохід із взуттям.
  EN TP: an aisle of spice stalls
  ua TP: прохід між ятками зі спеціями
  EN FP: the aisle of a plane
  ua FP: прохід у літаку
5066 | sample (noun): a small part that shows what the whole is like | loc: зразок
  EN TS: Just one olive, as a sample.
  ua TS: Лише одна оливка, як зразок.
  EN FS: Just one date, as a sample.
  ua FS: Лише один фінік, як зразок.
  EN TP: an olive as a sample
  ua TP: оливка як зразок
  EN FP: a sample of spices
  ua FP: зразок спецій
5067 | marriage (noun): the state of being a married couple | loc: шлюб
  EN TS: Marriage starts with a kiss!
  ua TS: Шлюб починається з поцілунку!
  EN FS: Marriage starts with a fight!
  ua FS: Шлюб починається зі сварки!
  EN TP: a marriage with confetti
  ua TP: шлюб з конфеті
  EN FP: a marriage in a church
  ua FP: шлюб у церкві
5068 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: наречена
  EN TS: The bride is giving a ring.
  ua TS: Наречена дарує обручку.
  EN FS: The bride is giving a speech.
  ua FS: Наречена виголошує промову.
  EN TP: a bride on the beach
  ua TP: наречена на пляжі
  EN FP: a bride in a church
  ua FP: наречена в церкві
5069 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: насолоджуватися
  EN TS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the massage.
  ua TS: Ого! Він насолоджується масажем.
  EN FS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the coffee.
  ua FS: Ого! Він насолоджується кавою.
  EN TP: to enjoy a neck massage
  ua TP: насолоджуватися масажем шиї
  EN FP: to enjoy a foot massage
  ua FP: насолоджуватися масажем ніг
5070 | mattress (noun): the thick soft part of a bed you lie on | loc: матрац
  EN TS: She's testing every mattress.
  ua TS: Вона тестує кожен матрац.
  EN FS: She's testing every pillow.
  ua FS: Вона тестує кожну подушку.
  EN TP: lying back on a mattress
  ua TP: лежати на матраці
  EN FP: carrying a mattress
  ua FP: нести матрац
5071 | service (verb): to make a machine fit to use again | loc: обслуговувати
  EN TS: He is servicing the vehicle.
  ua TS: Він обслуговує автомобіль.
  EN FS: He is servicing the bicycle.
  ua FS: Він обслуговує велосипед.
  EN TP: servicing a silver car
  ua TP: обслуговувати сріблясту машину
  EN FP: servicing a washing machine
  ua FP: обслуговувати пральну машину
5072 | liquid (noun): a substance that is liquid, not solid or gas | loc: рідина
  EN TS: The brown liquid is very viscous.
  ua TS: Коричнева рідина дуже в'язка.
  EN FS: The green liquid is very viscous.
  ua FS: Зелена рідина дуже в'язка.
  EN TP: pouring a brown liquid
  ua TP: наливати коричневу рідину
  EN FP: pouring a clear liquid
  ua FP: наливати прозору рідину
5073 | medicine (noun): something you take that treats an illness | loc: ліки
  EN TS: This medicine tastes awful!
  ua TS: Ці ліки жахливі на смак!
  EN FS: This medicine tastes great!
  ua FS: Ці ліки чудові на смак!
  EN TP: a spoon of brown medicine
  ua TP: ложка коричневих ліків
  EN FP: a medicine for a dog
  ua FP: ліки для собаки
5074 | introduce (verb): to make people come to know each other | loc: представити
  EN TS: Everyone is introducing themselves to her.
  ua TS: Усі їй представляються.
  EN FS: Everyone is introducing themselves to him.
  ua FS: Усі йому представляються.
  EN TP: introducing a new colleague
  ua TP: представити нову колегу
  EN FP: introducing a new product
  ua FP: представити новий продукт
5075 | sticky (adjective): having sticky properties, like glue | loc: липкий
  EN TS: Sticky hands, empty cone. "Great."
  ua TS: Липкі руки, порожній ріжок. «Супер».
  EN FS: Sticky hands, full cone. "Great."
  ua FS: Липкі руки, повний ріжок. «Супер».
  EN TP: sticky hands from ice cream
  ua TP: липкі від морозива руки
  EN FP: sticky tape on a box
  ua FP: липка стрічка на коробці
5076 | member (noun): one of the persons who joined a group | loc: член
  EN TS: She is a new club member.
  ua TS: Вона — новий член клубу.
  EN FS: She is a new band member.
  ua FS: Вона — новий член гурту.
  EN TP: a new club member
  ua TP: новий член клубу
  EN FP: a member of a band
  ua FP: член гурту
5077 | recall (verb): to bring knowledge back from your memory | loc: пригадувати
  EN TS: He recalled every card, easy.
  ua TS: Він пригадав кожну картку, ізі.
  EN FS: She recalled every card, easy.
  ua FS: Вона пригадала кожну картку, ізі.
  EN TP: recalling answers on cards
  ua TP: пригадувати відповіді на картках
  EN FP: recalling a broken car
  ua FP: відкликати авто з браком
5078 | pork (noun): meat that comes from a pig | loc: свинина
  EN TS: He is making pork tacos.
  ua TS: Він робить тако зі свининою.
  EN FS: He is making fish tacos.
  ua FS: Він робить тако з рибою.
  EN TP: slicing roasted pork
  ua TP: нарізати запечену свинину
  EN FP: pork chops in a pan
  ua FP: відбивні зі свинини на сковороді
5079 | pyramid (noun): a huge ancient building with triangle sides | loc: піраміда
  EN TS: Taco first, pyramid second.
  ua TS: Спершу тако, потім піраміда.
  EN FS: Taco first, beach second.
  ua FS: Спершу тако, потім пляж.
  EN TP: a pyramid in the jungle
  ua TP: піраміда в джунглях
  EN FP: a pyramid in the desert
  ua FP: піраміда в пустелі
5080 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: жовтий
  EN TS: The yellow dress looks great.
  ua TS: Жовта сукня виглядає чудово.
  EN FS: The yellow coat looks great.
  ua FS: Жовте пальто виглядає чудово.
  EN TP: a bright yellow sundress
  ua TP: яскраво-жовтий сарафан
  EN FP: a bright yellow raincoat
  ua FP: яскраво-жовтий дощовик
5081 | purple (adjective): the color between red and blue | loc: фіолетовий
  EN TS: Purple is her colour.
  ua TS: Фіолетовий — це її колір.
  EN FS: Green is her colour.
  ua FS: Зелений — це її колір.
  EN TP: a fitted purple dress
  ua TP: облягаюча фіолетова сукня
  EN FP: a purple silk scarf
  ua FP: фіолетовий шовковий шарф
5082 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: зачіска
  EN TS: Two buns? Great hairstyle.
  ua TS: Два пучки? Класна зачіска.
  EN FS: Two braids? Great hairstyle.
  ua FS: Дві коси? Класна зачіска.
  EN TP: a hairstyle with two buns
  ua TP: зачіска з двома пучками
  EN FP: a hairstyle with a fringe
  ua FP: зачіска з чубчиком
5083 | berry (noun): small soft fruits that you can eat | loc: ягода
  EN TS: They are adding berries.
  ua TS: Вони додають ягоди.
  EN FS: They are adding nuts.
  ua FS: Вони додають горіхи.
  EN TP: red berries in the batter
  ua TP: червоні ягоди в тісті
  EN FP: picking berries in a forest
  ua FP: збирати ягоди в лісі
5084 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: зелений
  EN TS: The green gown is stunning!
  ua TS: Зелена сукня — просто розкіш!
  EN FS: The red gown is stunning!
  ua FS: Червона сукня — просто розкіш!
  EN TP: a long green gown
  ua TP: довга зелена сукня
  EN FP: a green evening bag
  ua FP: зелена вечірня сумочка
5085 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: статуя
  EN TS: She is posing like the statue!
  ua TS: Вона позує, як статуя!
  EN FS: She is posing like the guard!
  ua FS: Вона позує, як вартовий!
  EN TP: a selfie with a statue
  ua TP: селфі зі статуєю
  EN FP: a selfie with a horse
  ua FP: селфі з конем
5086 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: блискучий
  EN TS: The floor is so shiny!
  ua TS: Підлога така блискуча!
  EN FS: The floor is so dusty!
  ua FS: Підлога така запилена!
  EN TP: a shiny stone floor
  ua TP: блискуча кам'яна підлога
  EN FP: a shiny new phone
  ua FP: блискучий новий телефон
5087 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: брудний
  EN TS: Paws made the floor dirty.
  ua TS: Лапи зробили підлогу брудною.
  EN FS: Paws made the wall dirty.
  ua FS: Лапи зробили стіну брудною.
  EN TP: a dirty tiled floor
  ua TP: брудна кахляна підлога
  EN FP: dirty dishes in a sink
  ua FP: брудний посуд у раковині
5088 | awake (adjective): not in a state of sleep | loc: не спить
  EN TS: The boy is awake and yawning.
  ua TS: Хлопчик не спить і позіхає.
  EN FS: The boy is awake and eating.
  ua FS: Хлопчик не спить і їсть.
  EN TP: awake at sunrise
  ua TP: не спить на світанку
  EN FP: awake at midnight
  ua FP: не спить опівночі
5089 | mother (noun): a woman who has given birth to a child | loc: мама
  EN TS: This mother does it all.
  ua TS: Ця мама встигає все.
  EN FS: This father does it all.
  ua FS: Цей тато встигає все.
  EN TP: a mother flipping pancakes
  ua TP: мама перевертає млинці
  EN FP: a mother buying pancakes
  ua FP: мама купує млинці
5090 | nursery (noun): a room in a home for a baby | loc: дитяча кімната
  EN TS: A cosy nursery full of toys.
  ua TS: Затишна дитяча кімната, повна іграшок.
  EN FS: A cosy kitchen full of toys.
  ua FS: Затишна кухня, повна іграшок.
  EN TP: a nursery with a cot
  ua TP: дитяча кімната з ліжечком
  EN FP: a plant nursery
  ua FP: розсадник рослин
5091 | motorbike (noun): a two-wheeled motor vehicle you ride | loc: мотоцикл
  EN TS: The small motorbike is green.
  ua TS: Маленький мотоцикл зелений.
  EN FS: The small motorbike is red.
  ua FS: Маленький мотоцикл червоний.
  EN TP: a green motorbike in town
  ua TP: зелений мотоцикл у місті
  EN FP: a green motorbike for sale
  ua FP: зелений мотоцикл на продаж
5092 | helper (noun): a person who helps someone | loc: помічник
  EN TS: Our helper moves boxes like a pro.
  ua TS: Наш помічник тягає коробки як профі.
  EN FS: Our helper moves plants like a pro.
  ua FS: Наш помічник тягає вазони як профі.
  EN TP: a helper with a box
  ua TP: помічник з коробкою
  EN FP: a helper with a lamp
  ua FP: помічник з лампою
5093 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: зарослий
  EN TS: The lawn was a bit overgrown.
  ua TS: Газон був трохи зарослий.
  EN FS: The pool was a bit overgrown.
  ua FS: Басейн був трохи зарослий.
  EN TP: mowing overgrown grass
  ua TP: косити зарослу траву
  EN FP: an overgrown hedge
  ua FP: зарослий живопліт
5094 | skinny (adjective): being very thin | loc: худий
  EN TS: He is flexing his skinny arm.
  ua TS: Він напружує свою худу руку.
  EN FS: He is flexing his skinny leg.
  ua FS: Він напружує свою худу ногу.
  EN TP: flexing a skinny arm
  ua TP: напружувати худу руку
  EN FP: wearing skinny jeans
  ua FP: вузькі джинси-скінні
5095 | awe (noun): a huge feeling of wonder at something | loc: захват
  EN TS: He is staring up in awe!
  ua TS: Він дивиться вгору в захваті!
  EN FS: He is staring down in awe!
  ua FS: Він дивиться вниз у захваті!
  EN TP: awe at a giant skeleton
  ua TP: захват перед гігантським скелетом
  EN FP: awe at a tiny coin
  ua FP: захват перед крихітною монетою
5096 | ground (noun): the solid surface of the earth you stand on | loc: земля
  EN TS: Mushrooms grow in the ground.
  ua TS: Гриби ростуть із землі.
  EN FS: Mushrooms grow in the water.
  ua FS: Гриби ростуть із води.
  EN TP: a mushroom on the ground
  ua TP: гриб на землі
  EN FP: a mushroom on a pizza
  ua FP: гриб на піці
5097 | music (noun): an art form of instrumental or vocal tones | loc: музика
  EN TS: His music stopped the street.
  ua TS: Його музика зупинила вулицю.
  EN FS: His music emptied the street.
  ua FS: Його музика спустошила вулицю.
  EN TP: street music
  ua TP: вулична музика
  EN FP: a music shop
  ua FP: музичний магазин
5098 | national (adjective): belonging to one nation or country | loc: національний
  EN TS: He loves his national team.
  ua TS: Він обожнює свою національну збірну.
  EN FS: She loves her national team.
  ua FS: Вона обожнює свою національну збірну.
  EN TP: national colours on a face
  ua TP: національні кольори на обличчі
  EN FP: a national holiday
  ua FP: національне свято
5099 | photo (noun): a print of a person or scene | loc: фото
  EN TS: Everyone is adding a photo!
  ua TS: Кожен додає фото!
  EN FS: Everyone is adding a stamp!
  ua FS: Кожен додає марку!
  EN TP: photos on a world map
  ua TP: фото на мапі світу
  EN FP: a photo album
  ua FP: фотоальбом
5100 | stick (verb): to put or fix something in place | loc: прикріплювати
  EN TS: They are sticking photos on a map.
  ua TS: Вони прикріплюють фото на мапу.
  EN FS: They are sticking photos on a door.
  ua FS: Вони прикріплюють фото на двері.
  EN TP: sticking photos on a map
  ua TP: прикріплювати фото на мапу
  EN FP: sticking maps on the wall
  ua FP: прикріплювати мапи на стіну
5101 | nausea (noun): the sick feeling that you may vomit | loc: нудота
  EN TS: Nausea is winning this trip.
  ua TS: Нудота перемагає в цій подорожі.
  EN FS: Nausea is winning this flight.
  ua FS: Нудота перемагає в цьому перельоті.
  EN TP: nausea on a ferry
  ua TP: нудота на поромі
  EN FP: nausea in a car
  ua FP: нудота в машині
5102 | alley (noun): a very narrow street between buildings | loc: провулок
  EN TS: This alley is super narrow!
  ua TS: Цей провулок супервузький!
  EN FS: This alley is super wide!
  ua FS: Цей провулок суперширокий!
  EN TP: a narrow medina alley
  ua TP: вузький провулок медини
  EN FP: an alley full of cats
  ua FP: провулок, повний котів
5103 | neck (noun): the part that connects the head to the body | loc: шия
  EN TS: A giraffe's neck is over her!
  ua TS: Над нею шия жирафа!
  EN FS: A horse's neck is over her!
  ua FS: Над нею шия коня!
  EN TP: a giraffe's long neck
  ua TP: довга шия жирафа
  EN FP: a snake around her neck
  ua FP: змія на її шиї
5104 | talk (noun): a conversation where people exchange ideas | loc: розмова
  EN TS: Their talk is friendly.
  ua TS: Їхня розмова дружня.
  EN FS: Their talk is angry.
  ua FS: Їхня розмова сердита.
  EN TP: a talk over the fence
  ua TP: розмова через паркан
  EN FP: a talk at a conference
  ua FP: розмова на конференції
5105 | ditch (noun): a long narrow channel dug into the earth | loc: канава
  EN TS: A ditch full of ducks.
  ua TS: Канава, повна качок.
  EN FS: A ditch full of boats.
  ua FS: Канава, повна човнів.
  EN TP: a straight water ditch
  ua TP: пряма канава з водою
  EN FP: a ditch by a motorway
  ua FP: канава біля автотраси
5106 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: вітряк
  EN TS: Windmill, tulips, stroopwafel: done.
  ua TS: Вітряк, тюльпани, строопвафля: виконано.
  EN FS: Windmill, tulips, pizza slice: done.
  ua FS: Вітряк, тюльпани, шматок піци: виконано.
  EN TP: a turning windmill
  ua TP: вітряк, що крутиться
  EN FP: a windmill on a beach
  ua FP: вітряк на пляжі
5107 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: колисати на руках
  EN TS: Both are cradling the baby.
  ua TS: Обоє колишуть немовля на руках.
  EN FS: Both are washing the baby.
  ua FS: Обоє купають немовля.
  EN TP: to cradle a newborn
  ua TP: колисати новонародженого
  EN FP: to cradle a teacup
  ua FP: тримати чашку в долонях
5108 | village (noun): a place where people live, smaller than a town | loc: село
  EN TS: The village is on the water.
  ua TS: Село стоїть на воді.
  EN FS: The village is on the hill.
  ua FS: Село стоїть на пагорбі.
  EN TP: a village on stilts
  ua TP: село на палях
  EN FP: a village in the snow
  ua FP: село в снігу
5109 | sweet (adjective): having the taste of sugar | loc: солодкий
  EN TS: A dozen sweet cupcakes, and she is eating alone.
  ua TS: Дюжина солодких капкейків, а вона їсть сама.
  EN FS: A dozen sweet cookies, and she is eating alone.
  ua FS: Дюжина солодкого печива, а вона їсть сама.
  EN TP: a tray of sweet cupcakes
  ua TP: таця солодких капкейків
  EN FP: a sweet cup of tea
  ua FP: солодка чашка чаю
5110 | quiet (adjective): with almost no activity going on | loc: тихий
  EN TS: The park is very quiet.
  ua TS: Парк дуже тихий.
  EN FS: The beach is very quiet.
  ua FS: Пляж дуже тихий.
  EN TP: a quiet misty park
  ua TP: тихий туманний парк
  EN FP: a quiet misty beach
  ua FP: тихий туманний пляж
5111 | nurse (verb): to care for someone who is ill | loc: доглядати
  EN TS: She is nursing a sick child.
  ua TS: Вона доглядає хвору дитину.
  EN FS: She is nursing a sick puppy.
  ua FS: Вона доглядає хворе цуценя.
  EN TP: nursing a sick child
  ua TP: доглядати хвору дитину
  EN FP: nursing a glass of water
  ua FP: потягувати склянку води
5112 | grain (noun): a small particle of a substance | loc: зернинка
  EN TS: Grains are flying in the air.
  ua TS: Зернинки літають у повітрі.
  EN FS: Grains are flying into a cup.
  ua FS: Зернинки летять у чашку.
  EN TP: falling grains of rice
  ua TP: зернинки рису, що падають
  EN FP: a grain of sand
  ua FP: піщинка
5113 | advice (noun): an idea about the best action to take | loc: порада
  EN TS: Good advice: eat more fish.
  ua TS: Добра порада: їж більше риби.
  EN FS: Good advice: eat more cake.
  ua FS: Добра порада: їж більше торта.
  EN TP: advice about healthy food
  ua TP: порада щодо здорової їжі
  EN FP: advice about money
  ua FP: порада щодо грошей
5114 | flamingo (noun): a tall pink water bird with a bent beak | loc: фламінго
  EN TS: The flamingos are flying away.
  ua TS: Фламінго відлітають.
  EN FS: The swans are flying away.
  ua FS: Лебеді відлітають.
  EN TP: a flock of flamingos
  ua TP: зграя фламінго
  EN FP: a flamingo in a zoo
  ua FP: фламінго в зоопарку
5115 | study (verb): to look at something in detail | loc: досліджувати
  EN TS: She is studying an insect.
  ua TS: Вона досліджує комаху.
  EN FS: She is studying a flower.
  ua FS: Вона досліджує квітку.
  EN TP: studying a small insect
  ua TP: досліджувати маленьку комаху
  EN FP: studying for an exam
  ua FP: готуватися до іспиту
5116 | to open (verb): to make something become open | loc: відкривати
  EN TS: He is opening all the windows!
  ua TS: Він відкриває всі вікна!
  EN FS: He is closing all the windows!
  ua FS: Він закриває всі вікна!
  EN TP: to open the windows
  ua TP: відкривати вікна
  EN FP: to open a present
  ua FP: відкривати подарунок
5117 | bookstore (noun): a shop where books are sold | loc: книгарня
  EN TS: He loves this bookstore!
  ua TS: Він обожнює цю книгарню!
  EN FS: He hates this bookstore!
  ua FS: Він ненавидить цю книгарню!
  EN TP: a packed old bookstore
  ua TP: забита старенька книгарня
  EN FP: a bookstore closing down
  ua FP: книгарня, що закривається
5118 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: сонячне світло
  EN TS: Sunlight is pouring over him. What a morning!
  ua TS: Сонячне світло заливає його. Оце ранок!
  EN FS: Rain is pouring over him. What a morning!
  ua FS: Дощ заливає його. Оце ранок!
  EN TP: sunlight through a window
  ua TP: сонячне світло крізь вікно
  EN FP: sunlight through the trees
  ua FP: сонячне світло крізь дерева
5119 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: вхід | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The entrance has wooden gates.
  ua TS: На вході дерев'яні ворота.
  EN FS: The entrance has glass gates.
  ua FS: На вході скляні ворота.
  EN TP: the park entrance
  ua TP: вхід до парку
  EN FP: the museum entrance
  ua FP: вхід до музею
5120 | surgeon (noun): a doctor who does surgery | loc: хірург
  EN TS: All done! The surgeons are happy.
  ua TS: Готово! Хірурги щасливі.
  EN FS: All done! The bakers are happy.
  ua FS: Готово! Пекарі щасливі.
  EN TP: surgeons around a patient
  ua TP: хірурги навколо пацієнта
  EN FP: surgeons in a waiting room
  ua FP: хірурги в залі очікування
5121 | remove (verb): to take something off or out by lifting it | loc: виймати
  EN TS: She is removing the muffins.
  ua TS: Вона виймає мафіни.
  EN FS: She is removing the cookies.
  ua FS: Вона виймає печиво.
  EN TP: removing a tray of muffins
  ua TP: виймати деко з мафінами
  EN FP: removing the oven door
  ua FP: знімати дверцята духовки
5122 | achieve (verb): to gain something by real effort | loc: досягати
  EN TS: They all achieved their goals.
  ua TS: Вони всі досягли своїх цілей.
  EN FS: They all missed their goals.
  ua FS: Вони всі не досягли своїх цілей.
  EN TP: achieving a hard goal
  ua TP: досягати складної мети
  EN FP: achieving good grades
  ua FP: досягати хороших оцінок
5123 | flood (verb): to fill something too quickly and spill over | loc: затопити
  EN TS: Coffee, sink and bath are all flooding!
  ua TS: Кава, раковина, ванна — усе затоплено!
  EN FS: Coffee, sink and oven are all flooding!
  ua FS: Кава, раковина, духовка — усе затоплено!
  EN TP: a flooding bathtub
  ua TP: ванна затоплює кімнату
  EN FP: a flooded road after rain
  ua FP: дорога, затоплена після дощу
5124 | marathon (noun): a running race of about 42 kilometres | loc: марафон
  EN TS: Marathon in the old town.
  ua TS: Марафон у старому місті.
  EN FS: Marathon in the forest.
  ua FS: Марафон у лісі.
  EN TP: running a city marathon
  ua TP: бігти міський марафон
  EN FP: a movie marathon
  ua FP: кіномарафон
5125 | stage (verb): to perform a play on a stage | loc: ставити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are staging a revolution!
  ua TS: Вони ставлять революцію!
  EN FS: They are staging a wedding!
  ua FS: Вони ставлять весілля!
  EN TP: staging an old play
  ua TP: ставити стару п'єсу
  EN FP: staging a protest
  ua FP: влаштовувати протест
5126 | business (noun): a company and the people who work in it | loc: підприємство
  EN TS: He is proud of his business.
  ua TS: Він пишається своїм підприємством.
  EN FS: He is proud of his car.
  ua FS: Він пишається своєю машиною.
  EN TP: a small corner business
  ua TP: маленьке підприємство на розі
  EN FP: a big online business
  ua FP: велике онлайн-підприємство
5127 | shut (verb): to move a lid so an opening is closed | loc: закрити
  EN TS: The suitcase won't shut!
  ua TS: Валіза не закривається!
  EN FS: The suitcase won't open!
  ua FS: Валіза не відкривається!
  EN TP: to shut a full suitcase
  ua TP: закрити повну валізу
  EN FP: to shut a window
  ua FP: закрити вікно
5128 | hurt (noun): damage to the body from an accident | loc: травма
  EN TS: The sofa caused real hurt!
  ua TS: Диван спричинив справжню травму!
  EN FS: The table caused real hurt!
  ua FS: Стіл спричинив справжню травму!
  EN TP: hurt from the sofa corner
  ua TP: травма від кута дивана
  EN FP: hurt from a football game
  ua FP: травма на футболі
5129 | cover (noun): a sheet put over a thing to shelter it | loc: накриття
  EN TS: The furniture is under covers.
  ua TS: Меблі під накриттями.
  EN FS: The furniture is under towels.
  ua FS: Меблі під рушниками.
  EN TP: grey covers on furniture
  ua TP: сірі накриття на меблях
  EN FP: a cover on a book
  ua FP: обкладинка книжки
5130 | kite (noun): a cloth wing on strings pulled by the wind | loc: повітряний змій
  EN TS: His kite is flying so high!
  ua TS: Його повітряний змій летить так високо!
  EN FS: His drone is flying so high!
  ua FS: Його дрон летить так високо!
  EN TP: flying a kite
  ua TP: запускати повітряного змія
  EN FP: a kite in a tree
  ua FP: повітряний змій на дереві
5131 | focus (verb): to direct your attention on something | loc: зосередитися
  EN TS: He is focusing on the ball.
  ua TS: Він зосередився на м'ячі.
  EN FS: He is focusing on the boys.
  ua FS: Він зосередився на хлопцях.
  EN TP: focusing on the ball
  ua TP: зосередитися на м'ячі
  EN FP: focusing on the crowd
  ua FP: зосередитися на натовпі
5132 | mixture (noun): a substance of two or more things mixed together | loc: суміш
  EN TS: He is pouring the mixture.
  ua TS: Він виливає суміш.
  EN FS: He is stirring the mixture.
  ua FS: Він розмішує суміш.
  EN TP: pancake mixture in a pan
  ua TP: суміш для млинців на сковороді
  EN FP: a mixture of paint colours
  ua FP: суміш кольорів фарби
5133 | scream (verb): to cry out very loudly in fear | loc: кричати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is screaming in the park.
  ua TS: Вона кричить у парку.
  EN FS: She is screaming in the pool.
  ua FS: Вона кричить у басейні.
  EN TP: screaming in a freeze game
  ua TP: кричати у грі «Замри»
  EN FP: screaming at a horror film
  ua FP: кричати на фільмі жахів
5134 | parent (noun): a father or mother of a child | loc: один з батьків
  EN TS: The parents are a bit busy.
  ua TS: Батьки трохи зайняті.
  EN FS: The dogs are a bit busy.
  ua FS: Собаки трохи зайняті.
  EN TP: parents feeding a baby
  ua TP: батьки годують малюка
  EN FP: parents feeding the ducks
  ua FP: батьки годують качок
5135 | space (noun): an area kept for one particular purpose | loc: місце
  EN TS: Tight space, perfect parking.
  ua TS: Тісне місце, ідеальне паркування.
  EN FS: Wide space, perfect parking.
  ua FS: Широке місце, ідеальне паркування.
  EN TP: a tight parking space
  ua TP: тісне місце для паркування
  EN FP: a space rocket launch
  ua FP: запуск космічної ракети
5136 | debate (noun): a discussion with reasons for and against | loc: дебати
  EN TS: The debate is getting loud!
  ua TS: Дебати стають гучними!
  EN FS: The debate is getting quiet!
  ua FS: Дебати стають тихими!
  EN TP: a loud debate
  ua TP: гучні дебати
  EN FP: a debate on TV
  ua FP: дебати на ТБ
5137 | parliament (noun): the building where politicians make laws | loc: парламент
  EN TS: The parliament is full today.
  ua TS: Парламент сьогодні повний.
  EN FS: The parliament is empty today.
  ua FS: Парламент сьогодні порожній.
  EN TP: a full parliament
  ua TP: повний парламент
  EN FP: an empty parliament
  ua FP: порожній парламент
5138 | train (noun): railway cars joined together that carry people | loc: потяг
  EN TS: She is on the train now.
  ua TS: Вона вже в потязі.
  EN FS: She is on the bus now.
  ua FS: Вона вже в автобусі.
  EN TP: a seat on the train
  ua TP: місце в потязі
  EN FP: a seat on the plane
  ua FP: місце в літаку
5139 | blank (adjective): with nothing written or printed on it | loc: чистий
  EN TS: The pages were blank at first.
  ua TS: Спершу сторінки були чисті.
  EN FS: The pages were full at first.
  ua FS: Спершу сторінки були заповнені.
  EN TP: a blank passport page
  ua TP: чиста сторінка паспорта
  EN FP: a blank face
  ua FP: порожній вираз обличчя
5140 | allow (verb): to give someone permission to do something | loc: дозволити
  EN TS: The stamp allows her to enter.
  ua TS: Штамп дозволяє їй в'їхати.
  EN FS: The stamp allows her to drive.
  ua FS: Штамп дозволяє їй кермувати.
  EN TP: allowed to enter
  ua TP: дозволено в'їзд
  EN FP: allowed to smoke
  ua FP: дозволено палити
5141 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: лікар
  EN TS: The doctor has a stethoscope.
  ua TS: У лікаря стетоскоп.
  EN FS: The doctor has a camera.
  ua FS: У лікаря фотоапарат.
  EN TP: a doctor with a stethoscope
  ua TP: лікар зі стетоскопом
  EN FP: a doctor in an ambulance
  ua FP: лікар у швидкій
5142 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: район
  EN TS: The neighborhood is decorated.
  ua TS: Район прикрашений.
  EN FS: The neighborhood is empty.
  ua FS: Район порожній.
  EN TP: a decorated neighborhood
  ua TP: прикрашений район
  EN FP: a neighborhood yard sale
  ua FP: гаражний розпродаж у районі
5143 | peace (noun): the state of having no war | loc: мир
  EN TS: The soldiers are making peace.
  ua TS: Солдати укладають мир.
  EN FS: The soldiers are making war.
  ua FS: Солдати ведуть війну.
  EN TP: making peace
  ua TP: укладати мир
  EN FP: peace and quiet at home
  ua FP: тиша й спокій удома
5144 | dove (noun): the white bird used as a sign of peace | loc: голубка
  EN TS: The girls are releasing doves!
  ua TS: Дівчата випускають голубок!
  EN FS: The boys are releasing doves!
  ua FS: Хлопці випускають голубок!
  EN TP: releasing white doves
  ua TP: випускати білих голубок
  EN FP: feeding white doves
  ua FP: годувати білих голубок
5145 | tram (noun): an electric city train on rails in the street | loc: трамвай
  EN TS: The tram is right behind him.
  ua TS: Трамвай просто за ним.
  EN FS: The bus is right behind him.
  ua FS: Автобус просто за ним.
  EN TP: a tram on the square
  ua TP: трамвай на площі
  EN FP: a tram on a bridge
  ua FP: трамвай на мосту
5146 | strip (noun): a long narrow piece of something | loc: смужка
  EN TS: The peel is one long strip!
  ua TS: Шкірка — одна довга смужка!
  EN FS: The peel is two short strips!
  ua FS: Шкірка — дві короткі смужки!
  EN TP: a long strip of peel
  ua TP: довга смужка шкірки
  EN FP: a strip of tape
  ua FP: смужка скотчу
5147 | people (noun): any group of human beings together | loc: люди
  EN TS: So many people are crossing!
  ua TS: Стільки людей на переході!
  EN FS: So many cars are crossing!
  ua FS: Стільки машин на переході!
  EN TP: people filling the crossing
  ua TP: люди заповнили перехід
  EN FP: people waiting for a bus
  ua FP: люди чекають на автобус
5148 | morning (noun): the time between dawn and noon | loc: ранок
  EN TS: Good morning, empty city!
  ua TS: Доброго ранку, порожнє місто!
  EN FS: Good night, empty city!
  ua FS: На добраніч, порожнє місто!
  EN TP: an empty morning street
  ua TP: порожня ранкова вулиця
  EN FP: a busy morning street
  ua FP: людна ранкова вулиця
5149 | pharmacy (noun): a shop where you buy medicine | loc: аптека
  EN TS: What a big old pharmacy!
  ua TS: Яка велика стара аптека!
  EN FS: What a big old bakery!
  ua FS: Яка велика стара пекарня!
  EN TP: a grand old pharmacy
  ua TP: розкішна стара аптека
  EN FP: a pharmacy in a hospital
  ua FP: аптека в лікарні
5150 | prescription (noun): directions a doctor writes down beforehand | loc: рецепт
  EN TS: He is presenting a prescription.
  ua TS: Він показує рецепт.
  EN FS: He is presenting a train ticket.
  ua FS: Він показує квиток на потяг.
  EN TP: handing over a prescription
  ua TP: передати рецепт
  EN FP: writing a prescription
  ua FP: виписувати рецепт
5151 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: рамка
  EN TS: The frame is silver.
  ua TS: Рамка срібна.
  EN FS: The frame is gold.
  ua FS: Рамка золота.
  EN TP: a silver picture frame
  ua TP: срібна рамка для фото
  EN FP: a silver window frame
  ua FP: срібна віконна рама
5152 | bedroom (noun): the room you sleep in | loc: спальня
  EN TS: Her bedroom is all pillows!
  ua TS: Її спальня — суцільні подушки!
  EN FS: Her bedroom is all books!
  ua FS: Її спальня — суцільні книжки!
  EN TP: pillows in the bedroom
  ua TP: подушки в спальні
  EN FP: pillows in the living room
  ua FP: подушки у вітальні
5153 | bed (noun): a plot of ground where plants are growing | loc: грядка
  EN TS: The team is planting the bed.
  ua TS: Команда засаджує грядку.
  EN FS: The team is painting the bed.
  ua FS: Команда фарбує грядку.
  EN TP: a raised garden bed
  ua TP: висока грядка
  EN FP: an unmade bed
  ua FP: незастелене ліжко
5154 | houseplant (noun): a plant kept indoors in a pot for decoration | loc: кімнатна рослина
  EN TS: His houseplants are a jungle.
  ua TS: Його кімнатні рослини — справжні джунглі.
  EN FS: His books are a jungle.
  ua FS: Його книжки — справжні джунглі.
  EN TP: a room full of houseplants
  ua TP: кімната, повна кімнатних рослин
  EN FP: a houseplant for sale
  ua FP: кімнатна рослина на продаж
5155 | lunch (noun): a meal eaten in the middle of the day | loc: обід
  EN TS: Lunch for the whole family!
  ua TS: Обід для всієї родини!
  EN FS: Lunch for just two people!
  ua FS: Обід лише на двох!
  EN TP: a big family lunch
  ua TP: великий сімейний обід
  EN FP: a quick lunch at work
  ua FP: швидкий обід на роботі
5156 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: ставати на коліна
  EN TS: He scored, so he is kneeling.
  ua TS: Він забив, тож стає на коліна.
  EN FS: He missed, so he is kneeling.
  ua FS: Він промахнувся, тож стає на коліна.
  EN TP: kneeling on the grass
  ua TP: стояти на колінах на траві
  EN FP: kneeling to pray
  ua FP: ставати на коліна для молитви
5157 | neighbourhood (noun): the nearby area around where you live | loc: околиця
  EN TS: The whole neighbourhood is playing football!
  ua TS: Уся околиця грає у футбол!
  EN FS: The whole neighbourhood is playing volleyball!
  ua FS: Уся околиця грає у волейбол!
  EN TP: a neighbourhood football game
  ua TP: футбольний матч на всю околицю
  EN FP: a neighbourhood bike race
  ua FP: велоперегони на околиці
5158 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: з'єднувати
  EN TS: He is connecting the cables.
  ua TS: Він з'єднує кабелі.
  EN FS: He is cutting the cables.
  ua FS: Він перерізає кабелі.
  EN TP: connecting a gaming setup
  ua TP: з'єднувати ігровий сетап
  EN FP: connecting with friends
  ua FP: бути на зв'язку з друзями
5159 | wet (verb): to make something wet | loc: намочити
  EN TS: The pipe wet him on purpose.
  ua TS: Труба намочила його навмисно.
  EN FS: The dog wet him on purpose.
  ua FS: Пес намочив його навмисно.
  EN TP: wetting the plumber's face
  ua TP: намочити обличчя сантехніка
  EN FP: wetting the kitchen plants
  ua FP: поливати кухонні рослини
5160 | dash (verb): to run or move very quickly | loc: мчати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He's dashing through the rain.
  ua TS: Він мчить крізь дощ.
  EN FS: He's dashing through the snow.
  ua FS: Він мчить крізь сніг.
  EN TP: dashing past pigeons
  ua TP: мчати повз голубів
  EN FP: dashing past the police
  ua FP: мчати повз поліцію
5161 | cathedral (noun): a very large and important church | loc: собор
  EN TS: He stands before a cathedral.
  ua TS: Він стоїть перед собором.
  EN FS: He stands before a castle.
  ua FS: Він стоїть перед замком.
  EN TP: a brick cathedral tower
  ua TP: цегляна вежа собору
  EN FP: inside a dark cathedral
  ua FP: всередині темного собору
5162 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: красивий
  EN TS: Beautiful views and dumplings.
  ua TS: Красиві краєвиди й вареники.
  EN FS: Beautiful views and pancakes.
  ua FS: Красиві краєвиди й млинці.
  EN TP: a beautiful mountain lake
  ua TP: красиве гірське озеро
  EN FP: a beautiful beach
  ua FP: красивий пляж
5163 | politician (noun): a leader who works in government | loc: політик
  EN TS: Politicians, arguing as usual.
  ua TS: Політики, як завжди, сваряться.
  EN FS: Politicians, hugging as usual.
  ua FS: Політики, як завжди, обіймаються.
  EN TP: angry politicians pointing
  ua TP: розлючені політики тичуть пальцями
  EN FP: politicians shaking hands
  ua FP: політики тиснуть руки
5164 | campaign (noun): a race between candidates for office | loc: кампанія
  EN TS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, confetti.
  ua TS: У цій кампанії є все: плакати, дебати, конфеті.
  EN FS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, fireworks.
  ua FS: У цій кампанії є все: плакати, дебати, феєрверки.
  EN TP: an election campaign
  ua TP: виборча кампанія
  EN FP: a campaign against smoking
  ua FP: кампанія проти куріння
5165 | plastic (noun): a material that can be molded into objects | loc: пластик
  EN TS: The river is full of plastic.
  ua TS: Річка повна пластику.
  EN FS: The river is full of fish.
  ua FS: Річка повна риби.
  EN TP: plastic in the river
  ua TP: пластик у річці
  EN FP: plastic in a recycling bin
  ua FP: пластик у контейнері для переробки
5166 | track (noun): the pair of rails that wheels run along | loc: колія
  EN TS: The tram is on the tracks.
  ua TS: Трамвай на колії.
  EN FS: The tram is on the grass.
  ua FS: Трамвай на траві.
  EN TP: tram tracks in the cobbles
  ua TP: трамвайна колія в бруківці
  EN FP: tram tracks in a tunnel
  ua FP: трамвайна колія в тунелі
5167 | tile (noun): a flat square piece covering a floor | loc: плитка
  EN TS: He is touching the blue tiles.
  ua TS: Він торкається синьої плитки.
  EN FS: He is touching the red tiles.
  ua FS: Він торкається червоної плитки.
  EN TP: blue-and-white wall tiles
  ua TP: синьо-біла настінна плитка
  EN FP: tiles on a bathroom floor
  ua FP: плитка на підлозі у ванній
5168 | batch (noun): all the cakes baked at the same time | loc: партія
  EN TS: The batch of tarts is okay.
  ua TS: Партія тістечок — норм.
  EN FS: The batch of bread is okay.
  ua FS: Партія хліба — норм.
  EN TP: a batch of custard tarts
  ua TP: партія заварних тістечок
  EN FP: a batch of cookies
  ua FP: партія печива
5169 | mail (verb): to send something by the postal service | loc: надіслати поштою
  EN TS: He is mailing a postcard.
  ua TS: Він надсилає листівку поштою.
  EN FS: He is mailing a package.
  ua FS: Він надсилає посилку поштою.
  EN TP: mailing a postcard
  ua TP: надіслати листівку поштою
  EN FP: mailing a parcel
  ua FP: надіслати бандероль поштою
5170 | package (noun): a wrapped container you send or give | loc: посилка
  EN TS: He is handing over a package.
  ua TS: Він передає посилку.
  EN FS: He is handing over a pizza.
  ua FS: Він передає піцу.
  EN TP: a wrapped birthday package
  ua TP: загорнута посилка на день народження
  EN FP: a package holiday
  ua FP: пакетний тур
5171 | add (verb): to join one thing to a group of others | loc: додати
  EN TS: He is adding stock to the pot.
  ua TS: Він додає бульйон у каструлю.
  EN FS: He is adding milk to the pot.
  ua FS: Він додає молоко в каструлю.
  EN TP: adding vegetables to the pot
  ua TP: додавати овочі в каструлю
  EN FP: adding salt to the soup
  ua FP: додавати сіль у суп
5172 | bang (verb): to hit something hard and violently | loc: гатити
  EN TS: Poor dough! He is banging it.
  ua TS: Бідне тісто! Він його гатить.
  EN FS: Poor door! He is banging it.
  ua FS: Бідні двері! Він їх гатить.
  EN TP: banging on bread dough
  ua TP: гатити по тісту
  EN FP: banging on the front door
  ua FP: гатити у вхідні двері
5173 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: дощовик
  EN TS: Good thing she has a raincoat.
  ua TS: Добре, що в неї є дощовик.
  EN FS: Good thing she has a sun hat.
  ua FS: Добре, що в неї є панама.
  EN TP: a red hooded raincoat
  ua TP: червоний дощовик з капюшоном
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  ua FP: дощовик на гачку
5174 | cheerful (adjective): bright and happy in a way that lifts you | loc: життєрадісний
  EN TS: It is a cheerful dinner.
  ua TS: Це життєрадісна вечеря.
  EN FS: It is a cheerful breakfast.
  ua FS: Це життєрадісний сніданок.
  EN TP: a cheerful family dinner
  ua TP: життєрадісна сімейна вечеря
  EN FP: a cheerful office party
  ua FP: життєрадісна корпоративна вечірка
5175 | moustache (noun): the hair a man grows on his upper lip | loc: вуса
  EN TS: Nice moustache, steady hands.
  ua TS: Гарні вуса, упевнені руки.
  EN FS: Nice beard, steady hands.
  ua FS: Гарна борода, упевнені руки.
  EN TP: a waiter with a moustache
  ua TP: офіціант з вусами
  EN FP: a waiter shaving his moustache
  ua FP: офіціант голить вуса
5176 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: кухоль | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Hot coffee in a big mug.
  ua TS: Гаряча кава у великому кухлі.
  EN FS: Hot tea in a big mug.
  ua FS: Гарячий чай у великому кухлі.
  EN TP: a big white mug
  ua TP: великий білий кухоль
  EN FP: a mug with no handle
  ua FP: кухоль без ручки
5177 | teapot (noun): a container with a spout for pouring tea | loc: чайник
  EN TS: She is pouring from a teapot.
  ua TS: Вона наливає з чайника.
  EN FS: She is pouring from a bottle.
  ua FS: Вона наливає з пляшки.
  EN TP: pouring from a white teapot
  ua TP: наливати з білого чайника
  EN FP: a teapot on the stove
  ua FP: чайник на плиті
5178 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: хустка
  EN TS: She is baking in a headscarf.
  ua TS: Вона пече в хустці.
  EN FS: She is baking in a hat.
  ua FS: Вона пече в капелюсі.
  EN TP: a navy headscarf
  ua TP: темно-синя хустка
  EN FP: a headscarf in the wind
  ua FP: хустка на вітрі
5179 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: дотягнутися
  EN TS: She is reaching into the oven.
  ua TS: Вона дотягується до духовки.
  EN FS: She is reaching into a fridge.
  ua FS: Вона дотягується до холодильника.
  EN TP: reaching toward a hot oven
  ua TP: дотягуватися до гарячої духовки
  EN FP: reaching the top shelf
  ua FP: дотягнутися до верхньої полиці
5180 | speaker (noun): someone who speaks to a group of people | loc: промовець
  EN TS: The speaker is at the lectern.
  ua TS: Промовець стоїть за трибуною.
  EN FS: The speaker is at the piano.
  ua FS: Промовець стоїть за піаніно.
  EN TP: a speaker at a lectern
  ua TP: промовець за трибуною
  EN FP: a speaker in the audience
  ua FP: промовець серед глядачів
5181 | signature (noun): your name written in your own handwriting | loc: підпис
  EN TS: Her signature is in blue ink.
  ua TS: Її підпис синім чорнилом.
  EN FS: Her signature is in red ink.
  ua FS: Її підпис червоним чорнилом.
  EN TP: a fresh blue signature
  ua TP: свіжий синій підпис
  EN FP: a signature on a cheque
  ua FP: підпис на чеку
5182 | achievement (noun): the action of finishing something difficult | loc: досягнення
  EN TS: Look, the mural is her achievement.
  ua TS: Дивись, цей мурал — її досягнення.
  EN FS: Look, the mural is his achievement.
  ua FS: Дивись, цей мурал — його досягнення.
  EN TP: a big mural achievement
  ua TP: велике досягнення — мурал
  EN FP: a video game achievement
  ua FP: досягнення у відеогрі
5183 | passionate (adjective): showing very strong emotions | loc: пристрасний
  EN TS: So passionate, the chalk is flying!
  ua TS: Така пристрасна лекція, що крейда літає!
  EN FS: So passionate, the books are flying!
  ua FS: Така пристрасна лекція, що книжки літають!
  EN TP: a passionate old teacher
  ua TP: пристрасний старий учитель
  EN FP: a passionate young singer
  ua FP: пристрасний молодий співак
5184 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: романтичний
  EN TS: He proposed. So romantic!
  ua TS: Він освідчився. Такий романтичний!
  EN FS: He sang. So romantic!
  ua FS: Він заспівав. Такий романтичний!
  EN TP: a romantic proposal
  ua TP: романтичне освідчення
  EN FP: a romantic comedy film
  ua FP: романтична комедія
5185 | kindness (noun): being considerate and sympathetic to others | loc: доброта
  EN TS: Kindness keeps the man dry.
  ua TS: Доброта рятує чоловіка від дощу.
  EN FS: Kindness keeps the dog dry.
  ua FS: Доброта рятує пса від дощу.
  EN TP: kindness in the rain
  ua TP: доброта під дощем
  EN FP: kindness in the sun
  ua FP: доброта на сонці
5186 | public (noun): people in general, taken as a whole | loc: громадськість
  EN TS: The public is in the square.
  ua TS: Громадськість зібралася на площі.
  EN FS: The public is in the church.
  ua FS: Громадськість зібралася в церкві.
  EN TP: the public in the square
  ua TP: громадськість на площі
  EN FP: the public in the theatre
  ua FP: громадськість у театрі
5187 | wagon (noun): a wheeled vehicle pulled by a tractor or animal | loc: віз
  EN TS: Strong boy! He's pulling a wagon!
  ua TS: Сильний хлопець! Він тягне віз!
  EN FS: Strong boy! He's pulling a car!
  ua FS: Сильний хлопець! Він тягне машину!
  EN TP: pulling a farm wagon
  ua TP: тягнути фермерський віз
  EN FP: pulling a horse wagon
  ua FP: тягнути кінний віз
5188 | disappointment (noun): the feeling when your expectations are not met | loc: розчарування
  EN TS: A boot? Total disappointment.
  ua TS: Черевик? Суцільне розчарування.
  EN FS: A fish? Total disappointment.
  ua FS: Риба? Суцільне розчарування.
  EN TP: disappointment on a jetty
  ua TP: розчарування на пристані
  EN FP: disappointment at a zoo
  ua FP: розчарування в зоопарку
5189 | weather (noun): the state of the sky: sun, rain, wind, clouds | loc: погода
  EN TS: Weather check: still raining.
  ua TS: Перевірка погоди: досі дощить.
  EN FS: Weather check: still snowing.
  ua FS: Перевірка погоди: досі сніжить.
  EN TP: checking the weather by hand
  ua TP: перевіряти погоду рукою
  EN FP: the weather on TV
  ua FP: погода по телевізору
5190 | windy (adjective): with a lot of wind blowing | loc: вітряний
  EN TS: Windy? She loves it!
  ua TS: Вітряний день? Вона в захваті!
  EN FS: Sunny? She loves it!
  ua FS: Сонячний день? Вона в захваті!
  EN TP: a windy seafront
  ua TP: вітряна набережна
  EN FP: a windy mountain top
  ua FP: вітряна вершина гори
5191 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: засніжений
  EN TS: A flag on a snowy plain.
  ua TS: Прапор на засніженій рівнині.
  EN FS: A flag on a sandy beach.
  ua FS: Прапор на піщаному пляжі.
  EN TP: a snowy white plain
  ua TP: засніжена біла рівнина
  EN FP: a snowy city street
  ua FP: засніжена міська вулиця
5192 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: горизонт
  EN TS: Only snow up to the horizon.
  ua TS: Лише сніг аж до горизонту.
  EN FS: Only sand up to the horizon.
  ua FS: Лише пісок аж до горизонту.
  EN TP: snow up to the horizon
  ua TP: сніг аж до горизонту
  EN FP: the sea on the horizon
  ua FP: море на горизонті
5193 | rash (noun): red itchy spots on the skin | loc: висип
  EN TS: Cream on the rash? It stings!
  ua TS: Крем на висип? Пече!
  EN FS: Cream on the burn? It stings!
  ua FS: Крем на опік? Пече!
  EN TP: cream on a red rash
  ua TP: крем на червоний висип
  EN FP: a rash on her cheek
  ua FP: висип на її щоці
5194 | novel (noun): a long fictional story printed as a book | loc: роман
  EN TS: Guess who loves this novel?
  ua TS: Вгадай, хто обожнює цей роман?
  EN FS: Guess who loves this film?
  ua FS: Вгадай, хто обожнює цей фільм?
  EN TP: reading a thick novel
  ua TP: читати товстий роман
  EN FP: writing a novel
  ua FP: писати роман
5195 | bench (noun): a long seat for more than one person | loc: лавка
  EN TS: His books take up the whole bench.
  ua TS: Його книжки займають усю лавку.
  EN FS: His shoes take up the whole bench.
  ua FS: Його черевики займають усю лавку.
  EN TP: books on a park bench
  ua TP: книжки на лавці в парку
  EN FP: a dog on a bench
  ua FP: пес на лавці
5196 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: пучок
  EN TS: Her bun and her book go everywhere.
  ua TS: Її пучок і книжка завжди з нею.
  EN FS: Her bun and her dog go everywhere.
  ua FS: Її пучок і пес завжди з нею.
  EN TP: a blonde bun on top
  ua TP: білявий пучок на маківці
  EN FP: a sweet bun
  ua FP: солодка булочка
5197 | rebel (verb): to take part in a rebellion | loc: повставати
  EN TS: The office is rebelling!
  ua TS: Офіс повстає!
  EN FS: The office is sleeping!
  ua FS: Офіс спить!
  EN TP: rebelling against work
  ua TP: повставати проти роботи
  EN FP: rebelling against parents
  ua FP: повставати проти батьків
5198 | sheet (noun): paper you write or print on | loc: аркуш
  EN TS: She is handing him a sheet.
  ua TS: Вона дає йому аркуш.
  EN FS: She is handing him a cup.
  ua FS: Вона дає йому чашку.
  EN TP: a small written sheet
  ua TP: маленький списаний аркуш
  EN FP: a sheet on a bed
  ua FP: простирадло на ліжку
5199 | follow (verb): to act in the way rules tell you | loc: дотримуватися
  EN TS: Recipe followed step by step.
  ua TS: Рецепту дотримано крок за кроком.
  EN FS: Map followed step by step.
  ua FS: Мапи дотримано крок за кроком.
  EN TP: following a handwritten recipe
  ua TP: дотримуватися рукописного рецепта
  EN FP: following a friend online
  ua FP: підписатися на друга в мережі
5200 | lively (adjective): full of life and energy | loc: жвавий
  EN TS: What a lively group!
  ua TS: Яка жвава компанія!
  EN FS: What a lively dog!
  ua FS: Який жвавий пес!
  EN TP: a lively living room
  ua TP: жвава вітальня
  EN FP: a lively dance club
  ua FP: жвавий танцювальний клуб
5201 | reflect (verb): to send an image or light back | loc: відбивати
  EN TS: The water reflects everything, including the volcano.
  ua TS: Вода відбиває все, навіть вулкан.
  EN FS: The water reflects everything, including the moon.
  ua FS: Вода відбиває все, навіть місяць.
  EN TP: a volcano reflected in water
  ua TP: вулкан, відбитий у воді
  EN FP: a face in a mirror
  ua FP: обличчя в дзеркалі
5202 | put (verb): to set something down in a certain place | loc: покласти
  EN TS: She put the whole shop in the fridge!
  ua TS: Вона поклала весь магазин у холодильник!
  EN FS: She put the whole shop in the oven!
  ua FS: Вона поклала весь магазин у духовку!
  EN TP: putting food in the fridge
  ua TP: класти їжу в холодильник
  EN FP: putting food on the table
  ua FP: класти їжу на стіл
5203 | relative (noun): a person related by blood or marriage | loc: родич
  EN TS: The relatives have arrived!
  ua TS: Родичі приїхали!
  EN FS: The relatives have left!
  ua FS: Родичі поїхали!
  EN TP: relatives at the front door
  ua TP: родичі біля вхідних дверей
  EN FP: relatives at an airport
  ua FP: родичі в аеропорту
5204 | improve (verb): to make better | loc: покращити
  EN TS: The room has improved a lot.
  ua TS: Кімната дуже покращилася.
  EN FS: The garden has improved a lot.
  ua FS: Сад дуже покращився.
  EN TP: improving an old room
  ua TP: покращити стару кімнату
  EN FP: improving their English
  ua FP: покращити свою англійську
5205 | oath (noun): a serious promise to tell the truth | loc: присяга
  EN TS: She is taking the oath.
  ua TS: Вона складає присягу.
  EN FS: He is taking the oath.
  ua FS: Він складає присягу.
  EN TP: taking an oath
  ua TP: складати присягу
  EN FP: breaking an oath
  ua FP: порушити присягу
5206 | evidence (noun): your reason for belief or disbelief | loc: доказ
  EN TS: She found the evidence!
  ua TS: Вона знайшла доказ!
  EN FS: She lost the evidence!
  ua FS: Вона загубила доказ!
  EN TP: pinning up evidence
  ua TP: чіпляти докази на дошку
  EN FP: hiding the evidence
  ua FP: ховати докази
5207 | sweat (noun): the salty fluid your skin lets out when hot | loc: піт | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Big mountains, lots of sweat.
  ua TS: Великі гори, багато поту.
  EN FS: Big lakes, lots of sweat.
  ua FS: Великі озера, багато поту.
  EN TP: dripping with sweat
  ua TP: обливатися потом
  EN FP: sweat after a sauna
  ua FP: піт після сауни
5208 | cuisine (noun): a style of preparing food, or that food | loc: кухня
  EN TS: Every cuisine amazes him!
  ua TS: Його дивує кожна кухня!
  EN FS: Every drink amazes him!
  ua FS: Його дивує кожен напій!
  EN TP: three different cuisines
  ua TP: три різні кухні
  EN FP: just one cuisine
  ua FP: лише одна кухня
5209 | lounge (verb): to sit or lie back comfortably doing nothing | loc: валятися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Nobody works; they are all lounging.
  ua TS: Ніхто не працює; усі валяються.
  EN FS: Nobody works; they are all dancing.
  ua FS: Ніхто не працює; усі танцюють.
  EN TP: lounging in a hammock
  ua TP: валятися в гамаку
  EN FP: lounging on a boat
  ua FP: валятися на човні
